https://archive.org/stream/bub_gb_UTNhTscJ9m4C/bub_gb_UTNhTscJ9m4C_djvu.txt
	...Certain events that occurred immediately after the British 
	occupation are selected out as a prologue to the Great Trek. 6 
	The "liberal" policy of the British toward black Africans 
	seemed particularly designed to provoke the Afrikaners. 
	Under pressure from English missionaries, the government 
	created a circuit court, known as the "Black Circuit" among 
	Afrikaners, which was empowered to hear complaints of 
	Hottentot servants against their masters. "It was not so much 
	love for the native that underlay the apparent negrophilistic 
	policy as hatred and contempt of the Boer" (Reitz, 1900, p. 
	92). The British even went so far as to employ natives "as 
	police against us; they were provided with arms and ammuni- 
	tion and we deprived of ours to be used against us; they 
	were incited to fight us, and, wherever it was possible, they 
	murdered and plundered us. 


Reitz, Boer statesman and attempted poet around time of second Boer war wrote to help build mythology of Boer civil religion. He complained that the "liberal" policy by English missionaries and gov was designed not "out of love for the natives but as hatred of the Boer" He claimed the British "employed natives as police against us."


from Reitz book "A Century of Wrong," published during second Boer war with introduction by W. T. Stead:

http://www.gutenberg.org/files/15175/15175-h/15175-h.htm
	During this century there have been three periods which have been characterised by different attitudes of the British Government towards us. The first began in 1806, and lasted until the middle of the century. During this period the chief feature of British policy was one of utter contempt, and the general trend of British feeling in regard to our unfortunate people can be summarised by the phrase, "The stupid and dirty Dutch." But the hypocritical ingenuity of British policy was perfectly competent to express this contempt in accents which harmonised with the loftiest sentiments then prevailing. The wave of sentimental philanthropy then passing over the civilised world was utilised by the British Government in order to represent the Boers to the world as oppressors of poor peace-loving natives, who were also men and brethren eminently capable of receiving religion and civilisation.

	It may seem inexplicable that the Power which stood up boldly at the Treaty of Utrecht as the shameless champion of negro slavery was the very one which was celebrated in South Africa for its morbid love of the natives; the explanation, however, is that it was not so much love for the native that underlay the apparent negrophilistic policy as hatred and contempt of the Boer. As a result of this hatred of the Boer, disguised under the veneer of philanthropy in regard to the aborigines, the natives were employed as police against us; they were provided with arms and ammunition to be used against us; they were incited to fight us, and, wherever it was possible, they murdered and plundered us. In fact, our people were forced to bid farewell to the Cape Colony and all that was near and dear to them, and seek a shelter in the unknown wilderness of the North.


Reitz singled out 1806 - ~1850 (great trek was ~1836) as a distinct period in Boer relation to British. Complains in this period that British hypocritically called out Beor for hating black people while hating Boer, laments that British propagandists represented Boer as opressors and black people as peaceful and capable of civilization, implies I think that accusations of Boer oppression are invalid because the British gov were hypocrites on slavery, says British policy to help slaves during that time were motivated by hatred of Boer instead of love for black people, and complains about British conspiracy paid protestors among black slaves. 



https://archive.org/stream/bub_gb_UTNhTscJ9m4C/bub_gb_UTNhTscJ9m4C_djvu.txt
	...The anglicization policy instituted under Lord Charles 
	Somerset, governor at the Cape from 1814 to 1826, struck 
	at the heart of Afrikanerdom. He brought out Scottish 
	ministers to serve in Dutch Reformed churches and English- 
	men to teach in country schools. All official posts were 
	reserved for the English-speaking; and after 1825 all official 
	documents were required to be written in English. "Petitions 
	in the language of the country and complaints about bitter 
	grievances were not even acknowledged. The Boers were 
	excluded from the juries because their knowledge of English 
	was too faulty, and their causes and actions had to be 
	determined by Englishmen with whom they had nothing in 
	common" (Reitz, 1900, p. 10).


Reitz complained that before Great Trek only English-speaking people could hold some gov positions, particularly church and juries for court cases

	
	The emancipation of slaves throughout the British empire 
	in 1832 was not in itself a cause for increased resentment 
	among the Afrikaners. Rather it was Britain's failure to keep 
	her promise of full compensation which led to embittered 
	feelings. "[G]reyheads and widows who had lived in ease and 
	comfort went down poverty-stricken to the grave, and gra- 
	dually the hard fact was borne upon us that there was no 
	such thing as Justice in England" (Reitz, 1900, p. 8). 


Reitz complained that end of slavery meant that old Boer widows wouldn't be taken care of anymore


from his book:


http://www.gutenberg.org/files/15175/15175-h/15175-h.htm
	A livelier sense of wrong was quickened by the way in which the emancipation of the slaves—in itself an excellent measure—was carried out in the case of the Boers.

	Our forefathers had become owners of slaves chiefly imported in English ships and sold to us by Englishmen. The British Government decided to abolish slavery. We had no objection to this, provided we received adequate compensation.[4] Our slaves had been valued by British officials at three millions, but of the twenty millions voted by the Imperial Government for compensation, only one and a quarter millions was destined for South Africa; and this sum was payable in London. It was impossible for us to go there, so we were forced to sell our rights to middlemen and agents for a mere song; and many of our people were so overwhelmed by the difficulties placed in their way that they took no steps whatever to receive their share of the compensation.

	Greyheads and widows who had lived in ease and comfort went down poverty-stricken to the grave, and gradually the hard fact was borne in upon us that there was no such thing as Justice for us in England.


Reitz says the Boers supported the end of slavery (didn't many Boer own slaves at time of publication?) and blamed it all on the English (slavery in cape was actually started by Dutch and inherited by English). Reitz complains that Boer weren't compensated enough for emancipated slaves and were forced to "sell their rights" for cheap, the complains of the hardship this caused Boers.


Moodie book says almost nothing on Boer practice of slavery

in his book mostly calls them "servants"

	
	...Kruger's civil theology thus amounted to a simple cycle of transgression, retribution, and reconciliation, well ex- pressed in his favorite quotation from Psalm 89:

		If they violate my statutes and do not keep my commandments; Then I will punish their transgression with the rod and their iniquity with scourges; but I will not remove from him my steadfast love or be false to my faithfulness. I will not violate my covenant, or alter the word that went forth from my lips. [Psalm 89:31-34] 

	Certain questions spring immediately to mind. Of whom was Kruger speaking when he used the word "People"? Were the indigenous black inhabitants of the republic also among the People of God? And were English-speaking citizens of the Transvaal included or not? 

	The native Africans were certainly not among the "elect." The most definitive experiences and powerful traditions of the Boer people labeled them as "nations without the law" (van Jaarsveld, 1963, p. 7). The Transvaal civil religion grew out of the experiences of the war of 1881. Before that the different religious and political groups in the Transvaal were joined only by a fierce sense of racial superiority over the indigenous peoples. Such racial attitudes had come into being before the Great Trek and were in fact one of the major reasons for that migration. 5 The racial beliefs of people on the eastern frontier prior to the Great Trek are epitomized by a magistrate's report from Uitenhage in 1805: 

		It is difficult and often impossible to get the colonists to understand that the Hottentots ought to be protected by the laws no less than themselves, and that the judge may make no distinction between them and the Hottentots. According to the unfortunate notion prevalent here, a heathen is not actually human, but at the same time he cannot really be classed among the animals. He is therefore a sort of creature not known elsewhere. His word can in no wise be believed, and only by violent measures can he be brought to do good and shun evil. [Marais, 1944, p. 73, n. 61] 

	Such beliefs made no mention of racial separation but argued rather that the African peoples ought to be kept in perpetual subjugation, serving their white (Christian!) masters. 6 

	The sons of Ham, argued the frontier farmers, were destined from earliest times to be hewers of wood and drawers of water. On the frontier, the desire for black African servants and for Bantu cattle, tended to override the discretion of the leaders, who usually preached a policy of justice and separa- tion. Kruger himself appears to have abstained from many of the excesses of his countrymen. He insisted upon equality before the law, at least in theory (Smit, 1951, p. 55); and he was convinced that missionary evangelism was both neces- sary and desirable, going so far as to argue that christianized Africans might own land in white areas (Smit, 1951, pp. 58-59). In practice, however, he acceded to the popular view that no black man, heathen or Christian, could ever be a member of the Transvaal People. 


Kruger's favorite Bible passage was about beating people with a rod for iniquity. In Boer civil religion, Boer were "elect" but black Africans were not. The different religious an political groups in Boer were united with a fierce sense of racial superiority which came about long before the Great Trek and was a major contributor to that. Their beliefs argued that black Africans should be kept in perpetual subjugation by Boer. One British magistrate said it was difficult to get them to understand that black people and Boer deserve equal protection under the law.

Their religion argued the "sons of Ham" were destined to be slaves. Kruger and some leaders would also sometimes preach equal protection before the law, but this was often overridden by desire among Boer to have slaves.


------


Slavery also started among Boer before their civil religion formed:

http://www.sahistory.org.za/article/history-slavery-and-early-colonisation-south-africa
	Even with slavery, the Dutch did not have sufficient labour power to provide for their ships. In 1657, some Company officials were released from their contracts and were allocated land along the Liesbeeck River. These officials became known as the Free Burghers (Farmers), and formed the nucleus of the white South African population that came to be known as Boers or Afrikaners.

	It soon became apparent that if the free burghers were to be successful as agricultural producers, they would need access to substantial labour. The indigenous peoples with whom the Dutch first came into contact, the Khoikhoi, had been settled in the region for at least a thousand years before the Dutch arrived, and were an unwilling labour force. This is because the Khoikhoi were a pastoral people, and as long as they had their lands, flocks of sheep and herds of cattle, they could not be pressed into service for the Dutch settlers. The settlers also practiced a form of settled agriculture that came into direct conflict with the pastoral economy of the Khoikhoi, and involved regular and structured seasonal migration.

	Therefore, as the Dutch settlement expanded, independent Khoikhoi communities were placed under unbearable pressure. Within 50 years of the establishment of the Dutch settlement, the indigenous communities near Table Bay, despite heroic struggles on their part, had been dispossessed of their lands and their independent means of existence had come to an end.

	Individual Khoikhoi men and women became incorporated into colonial society as low-status servants. Beyond the mountains of Table Valley, communities of Khoisan (as the Khoikhoi and the indigenous hunter-gatherer San are collectively called) survived until the end of the eighteenth century, but there can be little doubt that for the indigenous populations of the Cape the arrival of the Dutch settlers proved to be a major turning point.

	The Dutch settlers were therefore forced to look elsewhere for their labour needs. In 1658, a year after the first free burghers had been granted their plots of land, the first slaves were imported into South Africa, specifically for agricultural work. These slaves arrived at the Cape on 28 March 1658 on board the Amersfoort and had been captured by the Dutch from a Portuguese slaver en route to Brazil. Of the 250 slaves captured, only 170 survived the journey to the Cape. Most of these slaves were originally captured by the Portuguese in present-day Angola. On 6 May 1658, 228 slaves from another group of slaves arrived at the Cape on board the Hassalt, from Ghana. From 1710 onwards, the adult slave population outnumbered the adult colonial population by as much as three to one.

	...In 1795, the Cape Colony became a British colony, before it was returned to the Dutch in 1802. During this first period of British rule, South-East Africa became the main source of slaves. This trend continued with the return of the Dutch who continued to buy slaves from slave traders operating in present-day Mozambique.

	When in control of the Cape, the VOC sent slavers to Mozambique and Madagascar. The main purpose of these expeditions was to trade slaves. In those days, travelling by ship was very uncomfortable and unhygienic for ordinary people, but especially for slaves who had to be kept confined.

	Between 1720 and 1790, slave numbers increased from 2 500 to 14 500. At the time of the final ending of slavery in 1838, the slave population stood at around 38 000. However, unlike the European population, which doubled in number with each generation through natural increase, the harsh living conditions of the Cape's slave population meant that their numbers could only be sustained through continued importation. Between 1652 and the ending of the slave trade in 1807, about 60 000 slaves were imported into the Colony.

	Thus the Cape became not just a society in which some people were slaves, but a fully-fledged slave society. In slave societies, the institution of slavery touched all aspects of life, as slavery was central to the social, economic and legal institutions. As the boundaries of the Cape Colony expanded beyond the immediate vicinity of Table Bay, slaves were put to work on the wine and wheat farms of the south-western Cape. Quite simply, the colonial economy could not function without the use of slave labour, and therefore slave-ownership was widespread. Although most of the European settlers of the south-western Cape owned fewer than ten slaves, almost all of them owned at least some slaves.


by 1807 almost all European settlers in south-western Cape owned slaves


	The most important social feature of slave societies is that they were polarised between people who were slaves and those who were not. Slaves were also defined by their race, and although the VOC did not institute a codified form of racial classification, the fact is that slaves were black and slave owners were white. There were a few slaves who had been freed, who were called “free blacks”. These “free blacks” had managed to acquire slaves of their own, but these slave owners were a tiny minority of the slave-owning population. Thus, colonial South Africa was from the very start a society structured along racial lines, in which black people occupied a subordinate position.

	Slavery was fully supported by the Roman-Dutch legal system that the VOC brought to the Cape. In terms of Roman-Dutch law, slaves were defined, first and foremost, as property. This form of slavery, known as chattel slavery, meant that one human being was the legal belonging of another human being. Slaves could be bought and sold, bequeathed or used as security for loans. Since slaves were kept in a state of slavery against their will, the slave owners and the VOC needed a system of laws to ensure that slaves were kept in their subordinate position.

	Therefore, slaves in the Cape were strictly controlled, and according to law, slaves could be severely punished for acts such as running away or failing to obey their owners’ orders. Slave owners were allowed to use harsh punishment like whipping, withholding food, and making slaves work more hours. Slaves who tried to run away were put in chains to prevent them from running away again, because many slaves from West and East Africa believed that if they ran away they could find their way back home. Slaves could even be put to death for attacking their owners.

	The food given to the slaves was terrible. It was only after the slave trade in Cape Town was banned that slave owners began to treat their slaves better. Better treatment of slaves was due to the fact that slaves were no longer easily available and therefore more expensive. Slaves were also treated better because slave owners did not want them to run away or die while they were still young. This was in contrast to the treatment of slaves before banning, as then it was cheaper for slave owners to buy new slaves instead of providing good care for them.


slaves were treated as property and could be legally beaten and abused, and were treated horribly. Many slaves from West and East africa wanted to run away since they thought they could find their way home. It was only after slave trade that slaves were treated better because slaves became more expensive

a lot of psycopaths in cape colony? almost everyone owned slaves and change in treatment only tied to slaves becoming more expensive


https://slavery.iziko.org.za/privatelivesofslaves
	The case of Reijnier who ran away after his daughter Sabina was abused, may be an extreme example of abuse, but illustrates the helplessness of the parent. Slaves were not allowed to get married. Life partners could therefore be separated at the whim of the owner. The children of slaves could also be sold separately from their parents. Many disputes between slaves and slave owners started when the owner disregarded a slave parent’s authority over their children. Some slave couples belonged to different owners. They were therefore dependent on the goodwill of their owners to see each other.

	Some slave men took Khoekhoe partners. That also meant that their children would not be regarded as slaves. The farmers did not like that and in 1752, the government allowed farmers to indenture these children until they were 25 years old. This meant that these children, given the derogatory name Bastaard Hottentots by the colonists, spent the best part of their lives in similar conditions as slaves.

	...All slaves had very little leisure time. They worked very long hours. A proclamation of 1823 stipulated that slaves were not allowed to work more than 10 hours a day in winter and 12 hours a day in summer. Even after the proclamation, slaves were made to work longer hours during ploughing and harvest times. The fact that it was necessary to limit the working hours of slaves make historians think that some slaves used to have to work more than 10 to 12 hours a day.


something off with this website

has one docs saying slaves were happy in their bondage, another about someone who enslaved a little girl and kept beating her while her mother had to watch

seems unlikely they were "happy in their bondage" if they had to make a law saying they can't have work more than 12 hours a day...

https://slavery.iziko.org.za/primarydocuments
	Peter Thunberg’s description of work done by slaves, written in 1772.

	Thunberg was a Swedish botanist who lived in Cape Town for while. 

	...In the houses of the wealthy, every one of the company has a slave behind his chair to wait on him. The slave has frequently a large palm leaf in his band, by way of a fan, to drive away the flies, which are as troublesome here as they are in Sweden.

	...Otto Mentzel’s description of work done by slaves on a farm.

	Mentzel, a German, lived at the Cape in the 1730s.

	...They rise at dawn but most of them take no coffee nor anything to eat until about 8 o'clock. Then the table is properly laid and both master and servants take a breakfast of warm meat courses: except during the vintage time, when the farmer and his family prefer a slice of bread and butter with some of the choicest grapes to warm food. This kind of breakfast tea is served and the men generally smoke a pipe. Then everyone goes to his work.

	...Generally speaking the servants themselves know what their daily task is, and it may be said that even the slaves are quite happy in their bondage. This may be clearly perceived in fine weather and on moonlit evenings. For although the slave has worked fairly hard and suffered from heat during the day, yet he is happy and sings, and plays on his raveking (ramkie) and even dances.

	But winter evenings they sit round the fire with a pipe of tobacco and tell each other stories of their fatherland in Portuguese [lingua franca]. Sensible slaves want nothing but food, clothing and tobacco; sensible masters do not deprive them of any of these, but take into consideration the heavy yoke of slavery and do not treat them unreasonably nor have them flogged unduly. If a slave does wrong maliciously, he is punished for it and endures the well-deserved chastisement rather than continuous abuse.


how many "unsensible masters" were there according to Mentzel?


	...A certain tribe among them, called Buchinese or Buckinese, brought from the mainland of Asia near the South-Western islands, will even thank one for a well-deserved hiding; but if they are made to suffer undeservedly, they become very indignant and often vengeful. They stand no rebukes from women, still less blows; but would defend themselves at the risk of their lives.

	For this reason, it is forbidden to import them into the Cape. But the ship’s officers who bring them along do not disclose their country of origin and who can recognise them? On occasions such as the end of the sowing season, during the harvest, after the vintage, or for work on Sundays and other special days, well-meaning masters would give their slaves some wine which has an immediate refreshing effect on their tired limbs.


Buchinese were known to fight back to abuse and for this reason they stopped importing them as slaves

how common was abuse in cape colony? Mentzel makes it sound like it was something on people's minds


	Sensible farmers also allow them to cultivate a small piece of land whereon they sow peas or beans for sale. For the money received, they buy ornaments and fine coloured kerchiefs to bind round their heads: puffs: i.e. small pieces of taffeta to sew to the edge of their trouser-legs, and articles of like nature.

	People may say what they please about the wickedness of slaves, but there are those among them who, if they are reasonably treated, behave themselves well and if, in addition, they suffer no want, are so faithful and attached to their masters, that they would lay down their lives for them if the need arose.

	Of this I could give many instances; and if many historians have a good deal to say about the extraordinary wickedness of slaves, they should also point out the unchristian, often inhuman treatment they receive from their masters.


Mentzel sort-of vouching for slaves, I guess against the "many historians" who have "a good deal to say about the extraordinary wickedness of slaves"

in this passage often contrasts "sensible masters" and "unsensible masters"

could infer about society from this--maybe Mentzel saw "unsensible masters" abusing slaves and saw it as a problem, trying to argue against it by basically saying it doesn't make sense to abuse slaves, also the bit saying "if you abuse a slave how do you know they are not Buchinese watch out"

a similar thing was going on in Cuba--if they really wanted slaves for profit, why kill them all?

	
	Trial of Reijnier, a runaway slave.

	The court is told about the maltreatment of Reijnier’s daughter. Source: Worden, N. 1996. The chains that bind us. A history of slavery at the Cape. Cape Town: Juta, p.69.

	On this day there was brought to the jail of the Landdrost of Stellenbosch and Drakenstein, the male slave Reijnier, owned by Matthijs Krugel, captured by Pieter Raijnertszoon, after information given to him by a cattle herder on his farm. The slave has been living in the mountains beyond the Berg River for many years, eating fish caught from the river and dassies he has caught.

	9 January l749: On this day, 9 January l749, there appeared before me, Arnold Schephauden, Secretary to the Landdrost of Stellenbosch and Drakenstein, and in the presence of witnesses, the female slave Manika of Bengal, aged approximately 60 years, presently the slave of Jacob Marais, who under the examination of the Landdrost Adriaan van Schoor, made the following testimony: That about 22 years ago, she was living at Simonsvalleij, the farm of her then owner, Matthijs Krugel in Drakenstein district.

	And there she had relations with one of her fellow slaves, Reijnier of Madagascar, and amongst other children they had a daughter named Sabina. Sabina had diligently performed much work for her master's wife, but without knowing the reason why, she had been much beaten and abused by the woman; so much so that her man Reiinier had earnestly asked his master to sell the child to someone else, for she could stand it no longer.

	That on a certain Saturday the aforesaid wife took Sabina into a back room after she had laid the table and stripped her naked and tied her to a post and the whole afternoon beat her with a sjambok and rubbed salt onto her. After she untied her she left her in the room, but the witness understands that the girl climbed out of the window and went and hid herself in the straw in the farmyard.

	That her man Reijnierupple the sjambok on them the next day, for, said my master, if you punish a slave you must do it that he cannot be known before a magistrate. My master ordered us to smear the treading floor and that the floor must be well laid the next morning when he got up, on that we made the plan to murder all the farmers; we did not smear the floor because it was evening and was dark; we also told my master this, but he notwithstanding would have that the floor should be smeared against the next morning.

	My master did not say anything more about it that evening, and we then immediately formed the plan, as I have already stated."


two slaves had a kid, masters wife kept beating the kid and nobody knew why, her dad asked master to sell his daughter because she couldn't stand it anymore, daughter ran and hid, slaves I guess plotted to kill the farmers.

This was a trial that I guess was famous

sahistory.org website weird about this one:

http://www.sahistory.org.za/article/history-slavery-and-early-colonisation-south-africa
	It is clear that Reijnier and Manika's owners, Krugel and his wife, whom they would have called Mijnheer and Mevrou, dominated their lives. Their roles as parents were also greatly inhibited by their status as slaves. For some reason, Krugel's wife had taken to regularly beating Reijnier and Manika's daughter, Sabina. Possibly this was a result of sexual jealousy, or perhaps Sabina did not perform her duties to the satisfaction of Mevrou Krugel. As parents, Reijnier and Manika had little control over the maltreatment that Sabina suffered and which they were forced to witness. It is a sad testimony to his lack of power that Reijnier, in an attempt to put an end to the abuse of his daughter, was prepared to ask Krugel to sell Sabina and possibly be separated from her for life.


explanation for behavior reminiscent of Frued-types or this:

https://www.nytimes.com/2008/06/23/nyregion/23slave.html
	“And Dakshina told the mother, ‘Samirah took milk without using a glass,’ ” Samirah testified. “And immediately I was beaten up by the missus.”

	Mrs. Sabhnani gathered the children to watch as Samirah was forced to recreate her transgression for the camera. If she ever “stole” food again, she was told, her children would receive the photograph. “And then my children would be embarrassed that the mother was the thief,” Samirah said.

	Law enforcement officials involved in the case theorized that some of Mrs. Sabhnani’s behavior may have stemmed from her own complicated relationship with food. She had been extremely overweight most of her adult life. Then, three years ago, she went on a diet that brought her weight down to less than 150 from more than 300 pounds.


another example:


http://www.sahistory.org.za/article/history-slavery-and-early-colonisation-south-africa
	Another anecdote of slave life concerns a slave woman by the name of Dina, who was owned by Roelof Petrus Johannes Campher, a cattle farmer in the district of George, Cape Colony. In October 1837, Dina was working in her master’s cattle kraal, loading cattle dung onto the wagon. The cattle dung would be taken to the farm garden to be used as a fertiliser. When the wagon was full, she stopped loading the wagon and instead piled up the dung for the next load.

	Her master asked her why she was doing this but he was not pleased with her explanation. Roelof then beat her twice with an ox strap. Dina tried to run to Mrs Campher to ask her to stop Roelof from beating her. However, Roelof removed her clothes from the back, tied her to a ladder and continued to beat her with an ox strap. He gave her twenty-one lashes, and before beating her, Roelof said to Dina that he did not care about the law. After the beating Dina was forced to go back to work.


https://books.google.com/books?id=vhS5AAAAIAAJ&focus=searchwithinvolume&q=Dina
	Dina began her story by telling the Justice that on a Tuesday morning in mid October 1837 she had been 'occupied in digging the dung out of the kraal'. She was loading a wagon, which would later take the dung to the farm's garden. About noon, her master, Roeloff Campher, appeared at the...

	...Dina, and he exclaimed, 'By God I shall now punish her, and she may complain.' By this, he seems to have meant that he would punish her until he was satisfied, the legal consequences be damed.

	Dina said that at this point she 'creeped [sic] under Mrs Campher' and begged Campher not to tie her to the ladder, 'but to beat [her] loose'. Her pleas were useless. Campher ordered Philip to help him tie her to the ladder

	...'On seeing this,' Sina said, 'I went and set [sic] behind the house--from there I could not see what took place with Dina.' She had heard, but had not seen, Dina begging Campher not to tie her to the ladder; she had heard the blows strike Dina and had counted 21 lashes; and she had heard Dina crying


another book on cape colony:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Tl_wKc_zncwC&pg=PA30&lpg=PA30
	Enforcing regulations was made more difficult by the fact that there were too few Special Justices and their resources were too meager. There were numerous instances of Justices complaining of inadequate funds for living accomodations, office space, payment and compensation of witnesses, salaries of clerks and constables, and travel expenses. Benjamin D'Urban, who govorned the colony from 1834 to 1838, informed London in early 1835 that eight Special Justices "in an extensive colony with its thin and widely scattered population will be utterly inadequate" to enforce the apprenticeship rules. He repeated the point several years later, arguing that "the vast extent of the Colony renders nearly abortive" attempts to administer the apprenticeship regulations, resulting in "slender protection" for the apprentices. Special Justice Barnes in Swelendam reported that he was responsible for territory amounting to 9,000 square miles with more than 3,4000 apprentices. His funds, he complained, were quite inadequate for the task.

	Not all Justices, however, were in such straitened conditions. The job of the Special Justice in Beaufort was described as a "perfect sinecure" by one official, probably because Beaufort district contained only 571 apprentices. Stellenbosch, by comparison, had 9,500.


Stellenbosch was a disctrict with not enough judges. Located in south western cape were almost everyone had slaves. This was the district where the trial of Reijner happened, where a woman kept beating a girl she enslaved and rubbing salt in the wounds and nobody knew why.

other parts of cape had more justicies per slave and must have had fewer slaves per population on account of ratio for cape overall--why the difference between districts?


	...Apprentices often officially protested their punishments, especially when they had been inflicted by their masters outside the supervision of a Special Justice, and also brought other grievances before the justices. The ex-slave Manisa of the Cape, interviewed in 1914 when she was eighty-nine, reported that in disputes with masters, apprentices

		were sent to the nearest landdrost [she probably meant the Special Justice, although other officials did sometimes her cases], who was supposed to hear both sides, but most of us found that they thrashed us without bothering to hear if we were in the right or in the wrong, and we had to make up our work when we got back to the farm.

	Manisa added that "after a bit," by which she obviously meant after the end of apprenticeship, "we would hire ourselves out to a good baas [boss]; and that's were it was good to be free."

	Manisa's negative assessment of the adjudication of disputes during the apprenticeship regime seems accurate in its essentials, but that did not mean that apprentices were always shortchanged by the system. In George, for example, apprentice Dina charged her master Roelof Campher with assault when he whipped her; he offered to free her if she would drop the charges. She did so, and the local justice took no action.


on "apprentices":


https://openaccess.leidenuniv.nl/bitstream/handle/1887/4235/1246876_067.pdf?sequence=1
	In so doing, of course, it is important to realize that tfaere were two emancipations at the Cape, not one. As in the rest of the British Empire (outside India), 2 slaves were freed in 1834, although for four years thereafter they were held as 'apprentices' under restriction, which dif- fered hardly if at all from those which had been imposed on them under slavery. However, before the promulgation of Ordinance 50 in 1828, the colony's Khoisan suffered under civil disabilities as a result of which their de facto position only differed from slavery in that they could not be sold, or in any other ways transferred from one master (or mistress) to another. Thus emancipation, even as legal concept, was a process which covered at least a decade, not a single event


https://books.google.com/books?id=Tl_wKc_zncwC&pg=PA30&lpg=PA30
	In 1840, employers Gideo van Zyl and Gert van Eeden were sentenced to time in prison and fined for viciously whipping a former apprentice named Adonis Edon, who was reported to have been laid up four or five days after the punishment. His offense was that he had left van Zyl's service without notice. In this case, a complaint by a former slave was satisfied, but the fact that two white landed in prison must have intensified calls by employers and others for some new legal means to control labor.

	Apprentices often appealed to the Special Justices on matters beyond the issues of punishment. This shows their determination to use what tools the state gave them to improve their circumstances, despite the slim chances of satisfaction. But even when cases were decided in favor of apprentices, they were sometimes frustrated. On one occasion, Special Justice Thomas Sherwin finded an employer for providing "insufficient maintenance" for her apprentice. The woman refused to pay, and Sherwin did now know how to collect. When he asked Cape Town for advice, he pointed out that the regulations specified no method of forcing compliance.

	...Nevertheless, for Coloured in general and freed slaves in particular, the oppresive structure of colonial soviety remained thoroughly intact. The numerous cases of individual resistance, successful or not, often had the effect of angering white masters and contributing to a more generalized negative attitude by many whites toward people of a darker color, whom they viewed as - to borrow the language of the apprenticeship statute - frivolous, vexatious, and malicious. Often these descriptions were presented in ways suggesting that they were bilogically fixed, a point we shall analyze more fully later. The apprentices were also, as De Zuid Afrikaan put it, "most ungrateful" toward their "much maligned" masters. To the extent that some agents of the colonial state aided these ingrates, the state itself shared the obloquy.


Cape colony kept slavery for four years from 1834-1838 under "aprenticeship" system, which was during Great Trek of Boer from Cape Colony.

Cape Colony had a court system for abuses of slaves by slave-owners or disputes between slaves and slave-owners. Justices complained that there were not enough funds for the task, and generally the system was understaffed and underfunded. The system was also organized poorly in that one Justice had district of 571 apprentices, while another had a distract over 9,5000. They only had 8 special justices for the colony, and Benjamin D'Urban told London these circumstances made attempts to enforce apprenticeship law "nearly abortive" and so offered "slender protection" for slaves.

Though the justice system favored slave-owners, slaves often protested their punishments. An ex-slave said that in disputes they were sent to an official to hear both sides, but most found they were thrashed without officials bothering to hear their case.

When cases did turn out favorably for slaves, it often had the effect of angering slave-owners (example?). Often slaves were described with racist rhetoric, that they had negative characteristics which were "biologically fixed." Slaves were described as "ungrateful" toward their "much maligned" masters. Coincident with the courts was strong public outcry by slave owners against slaves and the state.


courts were overworked and often got cases of punishment of slaves in apprenticeship era (others?), points to abuse being wide-spread problem though doesn't give hard numbers

documented anecdotes are disturbing--why didn't this coalesce in something like abolitionist movement (did it?)


another thing:

https://archive.org/stream/recordsofcapecol20theauoft/recordsofcapecol20theauoft_djvu.txt
	Records of the Cape Colony.

	Letter from Earl Bathurst to Lord Charles Somerset. 

	Downing Street, London, 8th February 1825. 

	My Lord, — With reference to the correspondence which 
	has passed upon the subject of the measures which His 
	Majesty's Government have directed to be carried into effect 
	for ameliorating the condition of the Slave population in His 
	Majesty's Foreign Possessions, I transmit to your Excellency 
	herewith enclosed a copy of an Order of His Majesty in 
	Council which has been passed in order to provide for the 
	Religious Instruction of the Slaves in the Island of Trinidad 
	and for the improvement of their condition. 

	I also annex copies of two Proclamations which have been 
	issued for the purpose of modifying and explaining certain 
	Provisions of the said Order. These Proclamations will at no 
	distant period be embodied into an additional Order in Council, 
	which will also contain a modification of the Clause numbered 
	42 in the Order of the 10th of March ; this modification will 
	render the forfeiture of Slaves on the second conviction dis- 
	cretional with the Court and the Clause will stand " cruel and 
	unlawful punishments " instead of " cruel or unlawful punish- 
	ments," which was a verbal error in the former Order. 

	In order that the arrangements already adopted by your 
	Excellency and which it may further be deemed proper to 
	make upon this subject generally should harmonise as much 
	as possible with the measures enjoined in the enclosed Order 
	and Proclamations, I have to instruct your Excellency to 
	transmit to me a draft of an Order to be submitted to His 
	Majesty in Council which shall be framed in the spirit of the 
	Regulations laid down in those documents and adapted to 
	the Laws and State of the Settlement under your Excellency's 
	Government. I have &c. 

	(Signed) Bathurst. 


this is a bad sign...

more on scale, cour tdocs:

https://books.google.com/books?id=4ydt9PZgv4cC&pg=PA5
	By 1834, the year of abolition, they numbered 34,241 out of a total population of 145,042, which also included whites and free blacks, the latter of whom defined as a people of at least partial non-European descent. Slaves thus comprised about 24 percent of the population. In the rural reigions in 1780, only 3.5 percent of farmers owned no slaves at all, and nearly 30 percent owned ten or more. (I have not found similar figures for the 1830s.)

	...The transition from slave to quasi-free labor is a significant watershed in South Africa's history since Europeans began arriving in 1652. It is comparable to the change from a largely agrarian to an industrial society at the end of the nineteenth century and that from an Apartheid to democracy. The development of racial attitudes that came to dominate South African culture, the growth and elaboration of the Coloured community, and the effects of the Great Trek, which was prompted in part by the granting of freedom to slaves and other Coloureds between 1828 and 1838, were changes sufficiently momentous to warrant consideration alongside those two other developments. I hope this study will successfully explain why.

	The primary evidence on which the study is based comes from contemporary newspapers and other publications; official letters, dispatches, and reports; missionary correspondence; travellers' accounts and participant's memiors; and court records. The bias in these sources is obvious. They are almost entirely written by whites, many of whom had axes to grind. To be sure, there is in some of these sources - for example, in judicial testimonies and depositions - evidence of Coloured and black attitudes. One problem with court documents, however, is that these statements are filtered through the media of translators and court clerks. Rob Turrell ads that, at least in the 1840s, records were not the work of court stenographers but of the judges themselves, as they "laboriously wrote down the translated evidence in English." Often the sophistication of witnesses' language makes it evident that the translator or the clerk is interpreting rather than recording testimony verbatim. And we cannot, of course, rule out mistakes. I know of no evidence, however, that translators, judges, or clerks consciously distorted the meaning of anyone's statements. I hope I have handled these sources with appropriate caution. If more non-European sources were available to me, much of value would undoubtedly be added to this work, and, perhaps, much altered.


24% of Cape Colony population were slaves by 1834

Great Trek prompted in part by granting freedom to slaves

many whites were racist, and since court documents were translated, sometimes by judge themselves, there is a risk of bias or forgery. The author knows of no evidence of translators, judges, or clerks distorting anyones statements on purpose.



another case:

https://archive.org/stream/recordsofcapecol00thea_20/recordsofcapecol00thea_20_djvu.txt
	...December 27, 1826. The Secretary of the Cape District 
	versus Johannes Martinus Horak. For a breach of the 13th 
	Article of the Ordinance No. 19, in having ill-treated and 
	punished in an unlawful manner his female Slave, nam?d 
	Malatie. Complainant stated that her master had punished 
	her very severely with a horsewhip over the back and posteriors, 
	having caused two male Slaves to hold her down during the 
	time he was flogging her. Defendant acknowledged having 
	given her eighteen or twenty stripes with a riding whip, in 
	consequence of her repeated insolence and ill-behaviour, and of 
	her having occasioned a serious disturbance amongst the other 
	Slaves in his family. From the evidence brought forward, it 
	appeared that the conduct of complainant had for a long time 
	past been exceedingly disrespectful and reprehensible, on which 
	account Mr. Horak had made arrangements for selling her, 
	but had been induced to pardon her upon promise of amend- 
	ment. She is a large, strong and most violent woman, and 
	could not have been held down without the assistance of two 
	men. The R. 0. prosecutor c 1 aimed the fine prescribed by 
	the said 13th Article, for improper punishment of a female 
	Slave. The Court suspended judgment, and resolved that a 
	reference should be made to the law authorities, being, on 
	account of the extreme ill-conduct of the complainant, unwilling 
	to fine the defendant. 15th January 1827. — The Board of 
	Landdrost and Heemraden having reassembled to decide on 
	this case, rejected the claim of the prosecutor, and condemned 
	complainant in the costs. 

Johannes Martinus Horak whipped Malatie severely 18-20 times over the back and posteriors after having caused two slaves to holder her down. This was brought to court for improper punishment of a female slave, for which the punishment is a fine. The court rejected the case on the grounds that Malatie "for a long time" had "disrespectful and reprehensible" conduct. 


next entry:


	December 27, 1826. Sabina, Slave of Alexander van Breda, 
	senior, — versus two sons of said Breda. A son of said Sabina 
	having hanged himself, a commission from the Board of 
	Landdrost and Heemraden proceeded, as is customary, to 
	examine the body, when it being understood that said Sabina 
	had mentioned amongst the other Slaves that she considered 
	that her son destroyed himself, in consequence of having been 
	beaten by two of her master’s sons ; it was therefore thought 
	proper that inquiry should be made into the circumstance, 
	and she was accordingly directed to appear before the full 
	board. The Guardian being requested to be present, the court 
	of inquest declared : That there were no appearances of 
	punishment on the body of the deceased ; and the surgeon’s 
	certificate stated, that after the most minute search, he could 
	not find the slightest mark of punishment. It was proved in 
	evidence that the deceased, who was about 13 years of age, 
	had been directed to look after four cows, which from his 
	negligence, in continually absenting himself, had done con- 
	siderable damage, and he in consequence received at one time 
	ten cuts, and at another, five cuts, with a small twig ; it appears 
	also, that he had again allowed the cows to do mischief in a 
	neighbouring vineyard, and in a plantation of young forest 
	trees ; and it was therefore thought that he had destroyed 
	himself from the apprehension of more severe chastisement. 
	The Board, upon these grounds, instantly dismissed the com- 
	plaint as false, and would have sentenced Sabina to punishment ; 
	but at the intercession of her master, she was allowed to return 
	home. 


The court concluded a 13 year old boy and slave hanged himself because he was scared of chastisement after he was negligent in looking after cows. The complaint of his mother, that the hanging was consequent on her masters two sons beating him, was instantly dismissed as false when a coroner's investigation found no signs of punishment but rather that the boy, in looking after the cows, had suffered 10 and then 5 cuts from a small twig. The boy's mother would have been sentenced to punishment, but was allowed to return home "at the intercession of her master."


next entry regarding potential wronging of black Africans in colony:


	...January 11, 1827. His Majesty’s Fiscal, versus Carel, of 
	Coenrad Johannes Fick, P-son. For inflicting a wound on the 
	Hottentot Adam, from the effect of which he died a short 
	time after. Proceedings had been originally instituted before 
	the Board of Landdrost and Heemraden at Stellenbosch ; and 
	after the necessary inquiry, the case had been referred to the 
	Court of Justice. (Vide No. 9 of the Report from Stellenbosch, 
	Appendix C, No. 3, of the Guardian’s last Report.) His 
	Majesty’s Fiscal stated, that there had been no wilful intention 
	on the part of the prisoner, and that the death of Adam had 
	arisen from accident, whilst Carel and Adam (both boys) were 
	playing together ; prisoner having unfortunately in his hand 
	an open knife, with which he was cutting tobacco, and the 
	deceased having rushed upon him. Adam did not die till 
	sixteen days after the wound had been inflicted, and in the 
	interim declared the wound to have been purely accidental. 
	The Court declared, that the confinement undergone by the 
	prisoner was sufficient punishment, and he was accordingly 
	released. 


The court was referred a case of "inflicting a wound" on the Khoikhoi boy Adam, "from the effect of which he died a short time later." The court found that Adam had ran into boy Carel, who was cutting tabacco with a kinfe, and recieved the wound that he died from 16 days later, not before declaring the wound was purely accidental. The court declared the confinement of Carel was punishment enough, and he was released. 


next entry of same type:

	
	...January 27, 1827. The Secretary of the Cape District, versus 
	J. G. Frank van Reenen. For ill-treatment of his female Slave 
	Rosina. It appeared that about six weeks since said Van 
	Reenen and his wife having been absent from home, discovered, 
	on their return, that some rice, sugar, coffee and candles had 
	been stolen from the store-room, and suspecting Rosina to 
	have committed the theft, or to have been privy to it, her 
	master punished her, after which she absconded, and was found 
	in the bushes about a month afterwards, and sent to the field 
	cornet’s, whence her master brought her home, and having tied 
	her up, flogged her with a quince switch ; the marks of punish- 
	ment were still visible on her posteriors. Complainant having 
	requested the attendance of three more witnesses on her behalf, 
	and the Court having directed summonses to that effect to be 
	issued, adjourned. 29th January : — said case resumed. The 
	three witnesses required by the complainant (all young children) 
	were examined : two of them stated that defendant had 
	flogged said Rosina partly on the back and shoulder, and partly 
	on the posteriors. The prosecutor in his claim stated, that 
	although complainant had at various times greatly miscon- 
	ducted herself, yet the punishment inflicted by the defendant 
	being in breach of the 13th Article of the Ordinance No. 19, he 
	had rendered himself liable to the fine therein specified, being 
	five pounds sterling, which he consequently claimed ; and the 
	Court accordingly sentenced the defendant to pay the said sum. 


Frank van Reenen returned home after six weeks absence and found some rice, sugar, coffee and candles had been stolen from the store room, and suspected Rosina committed the theft or knew about it. van Reenan flogged Rosina. Rosina fled and was found a month later, then van Reenan brought her back, tied her up, and flogged her again with a switch. The flogging left marks on Rosina. The court found that though Rosian "misconducted herself at various times", the punishment was unlawful, and ordered van Reenen to pay a fine of five pounds.


next entry of same type:


	...February 1, 1827. The Secretary of the Cape District versus 
	Johannes Christian Kotze, Jan’s son. For severely flogging 
	his female Slave Eva. Complainant stated, that she was 
	making bread for the family, and told her mistress that there 
	was so much barley to mix in it that it would not bind, which 
	being represented to her master, he immediately got angry and 
	called for a sambok, (a species of whip made from the hide of 
	the hippopotamus or rhinoceros) with which he gave her 25 
	lashes, and within a short period 25 more, for which she could 
	assign no reason. When she was flogged, her hands and legs 
	were tied, and her hands being placed under her knees, a stick 
	was passed between, and she was then thrown on the floor, and 
	flogged on the back, shoulders and posteriors ; her clothes, 
	however, being on. The medical certificate stated, that on 
	examination there were found a considerable number of marks 
	and stripes, some of which were in an ulcerated state, on her 
	shoulders, back, posteriors and arms. The witnesses for 
	defendant gave Eva a bad character. The prosecutor claimed 
	that the complainant might be sold, and never again become 
	the property of the defendant, or that of his wife, children, 
	parents, brothers and sisters. The Court rejected the claim of 
	the prosecutor, and sentenced the defendant to a fine of £30 
	sterling, with costs.


Eva told court she was making bread for the Kotzes, and told Mrs. Kotze that there was so much barely in it that it wouldn't bind, then Mrs. Ktoze told this to Mr. Kotze, who tied up Eva's hands and legs and whipped her 25 times, then later 25 more for which she couldn't assign a reason. This left many marks, some of which were in an "ulcerated state." Kotze and his witness said Eva had poor character and that she might be sold and never again become his property or of his wife and children. The court ordered Kotze to pay a fine of 30 pounds.

next entry February 23, 1827 something about manumission dispute

after that:


	...March 7, 1827. The Secretary of the Cape District versus 
	Jan Willem Eksteen. J. P. son. On a charge of ill-treatment 
	preferred by his Slave Jupiter. For the defendant it was 
	proved in evidence, that Jupiter, having conducted himself in 
	a very insolent manner, in consequence of not receiving his 
	dinner exactly at the usual time, was, by direction of the 
	defendant, taken to the prison at Rondebosch ; where, as he 
	expressed no regret for his ill behaviour, it was found necessary, 
	for example’s sake, to cause him to be punished. Upon being 
	brought back, he for some time neglected to go to his work ; 
	and when his master desired him to do it, he went towards the 
	vineyard, making use of very violent language ; when, defen- 
	dant asking him what he meant by such conduct, he came 
	forward in a most insolent and insubordinate manner, and 
	having a pruning knife in his hand for the purpose of cutting 
	the vines, his behaviour was so unruly and threatening, that 
	defendant caused him to be laid down by the other Slaves, and 
	gave him 20 stripes upon his posteriors with a walking cane 
	about the thickness of a finger. The Court, however, con- 
	sidering the conduct of defendant unjustifiable, on account of 
	his residing so near the prison, to which he might have sent 
	complainant a second time, and had him tried for his disorderly 
	behaviour, fined him five pounds sterling.


Court found Jupiter had condcuted himself in a "very insolent manner" because he didn't get dinner exactly at the usual time. For this Eksteen took him to the prison at Rondesbosch, where, "for Jupiter's sake" it was found necessary to punish him since he expressed no regret for his "ill behavior." When Jupiter was brought back, didn't go to work for some time, and when Eksteen confronted him on this Jupiter came forward "in a most insolent and insubordiante manner" while holding a pruning kinfe for the purpose of cutting vines (I thought he wasn't at work?). His behaviour was "so unruly and threatening" that Eksteen caused him to be held down and beat him 20 times with a walking cane. The Court considered Ecksteens conduct unjustifiable since he could have brought him back to the prison instead, and fined him five pounds sterling.


next entry involving complaint by a slave:


	March 19, 1827. His Majesty’s Fiscal, versus Lodewyk, Slave of Coenrad Hendrik Laubscher, senior. On a complaint of his master, that he, Lodewyk, had struck him several blows about the face and head, either with his fist or some hard substance inclosed within his hand, by which said Laubscher was severely cut and bruised. The prisoner, having heard the charge, stated, that his master having slept the whole night in his waggon, which was outspanned, (unteamed, and the horses allowed to graze,) at the Drie Fonteinen, on getting up, on a Friday morning, called him to put on his shoes ; and that whilst he was so doing, his master said that he hurt his foot, which was sore, and thereupon kicked him violently in the throat, and struck him several blows ; and on coming down from the waggon, was reaching his gun, when he (prisoner) being apprehensive that his master intended to shoot him, clasped him round the body to prevent him ; when he, Laub- scher, in consequence of the horses moving on, fell against some of the iron work of the waggon, by which his face was much cut and bruised. That he (the prisoner,) seeing this, ran off, to get out of the reach of the gun, saying at the same time, that he did not intend to desert, but that he knew where he would go, meaning, that he would go to Cape Town to complain of his master’s ill-usage (showing at the same time a wound on his head, which he stated to haAm been inflicted by his master with the thick end of the waggon whip ;) that he did accordingly come to town for that purpose, when Mr. Servaas de Kock caused him to be apprehended ; said Laub- scher having previously arrived in town, and lodged his com- plaint at the Landdrost’s office. Prisoner objected to the Slave boy Mentor of complainant, being admitted as a witness, on the ground that his master had promised him his freedom. Coenrad Hendrik Laubscher, (the complainant), stated in substance as follows : That he was on his way from Cape Town to his farm, and having slept in his waggon during the night between the 8th and 9th of January, was getting up in the morning, when he called prisoner, who was helping to harness the horses, to put the shoe on his left foot, he having a bad leg ; in doing which Lodewyk hurt him very much, and on being asked, why he did so ? answered impertinently that he had not hurt him ; when he, complainant, told him he deserved nothing better than a kick for his insolence. That being about to start on his journey, he wished first to get down from his waggon, and being infirm from the sore on his leg, he was getting down from the back part with his face tOwards the waggon, when just as he was about to put his foot to the ground, the prisoner cried out, “ What will you now do to me ? ” and instantly struck him a violent blow on the forehead, from the effect of which he immediately fell to the ground ; and AA'hen in the act of rising, he was again knocked down by the prisoner, who then struck him several more blows on the face, by which he was severely bruised. That upon getting up again, he called to the boy Mentor, who was at the head of the horses, to give him the whip, which he was doing, when the horses first began to move on ; and he, complainant, having caught hold of the whip by the small end, made a blow at the prisoner, which might possibly have reached him ; in so doing however, the whip broke, and Lodewyk laid hold of the thick end, when he, complainant, called to Mentor, to make the reins fast, and to endeavour to secure him by the legs. Prisoner however went away a short distance, and turning round, said, it was of little consequence whether he died today or to- morrow, and began feeling in his pockets as if for a knife, upon which, and not before, he, Laubscher, got down his gun from the waggon, and went in search of Lodewyk, but it being a misty morning, he could not find him. That in consequence of these circumstances he returned to Cape Town, to represent them to the Landdrost. On being questioned by the Guardian, complainant denied having struck or kicked the prisoner ; and stated that his conduct was generally good, but that during the whole of this last journey to Cape Town, he had not behaved well. Mentor, Slave of complainant, stated the case nearly as said Laubscher had done ; adding that his master promised him his freedom, when he called him to assist in securing Lodewyk. In answer to questions put by the Guardian, witness said, that he did not see his master strike or kick Lodewyk when he put on his shoe, but that it might have happened without his seeing it. Witness saw Lodewyk strike his master in the face as he was getting down from the waggon, but the horses beginning to move on just at that time, he fell towards the waggon with his face downwards ; and further, that when Lodewyk struck complainant, he did not perceive that he had any thing in his hand, but thinks he struck him with his fist only. Lodewyk having in the course of his statement mentioned, that on his way to Cape Town, he had gone to a brook near the Driefonteinen, where he had washed his handkerchief, which was bloody, and having found two women washing, he showed them the wound in his head, and told them how he had received it, the Court closed in order to consider the propriety of examining these women and other persons, and also to decide respecting the request of the Guardian, that a curator should be allowed for the defence of the prisoner, as the charge against him was, by the laws of the colony, of a capital nature. The Court having re-opened, it was resolved to cause the other witnesses to be summoned, and to appoint Mr. Advocate De Wet, curator for the prisoner. The Court then adjourned. 19th April 1827 : — The trial of Lodewyk was this day resumed, when the following persons were examined. Doctor Liesching deposed, that he had been called to examine the complainant, on his arrival at the Landdrost’s office, and considered that the wounds upon his face might have been occasioned by his falling upon some sharp substance, as well as from blows. Van Schalkwyk, field cornet of Groenkloof, declared, that all he knew of the case was from what he had been told by complainant. Louis Greeff deposed, that having heard Mr. Laubsclier’s complaint at the Landdrost’s office, he was afterwards standing on the steps of Servaas de Kock’s house, in Cape Toavii, when seeing the prisoner (whom he knew) passing by, he called to him, and asked him where he was going ; upon which prisoner said “ Have you not heard that my master was going to shoot me, and that I was obliged to strike him in my own defence ; ” and on being asked by witness on what part he had struck his master, he replied “ in the face.” Prisoner asked the witness if he meant positively to assert that he had told him that he had struck his master in the face ; to which Greeff answered, “ yes ; you did say so, and that your master fell in consequence, and on getting up, called Mentor to give him the whip, with which you said he struck you on the head, and called upon Mentor to help in securing you, promising at the same time to make him free.” Witness further deposed, that Lodewyk told him, that after the blows had passed, his master wished to get up into his waggon to reach his gun, and that he caught hold of him twice by the waist, and drew him back to prevent him from getting it. Servaas de Kock deposed, that having been informed by the preceding witness that the Slave Lodewyk, of Conrad Hendrik Laubscher, was at his door, he desired Greeff to keep him in conversation, and in the mean time sent for two constables ; upon the arrival of whom, witness asked the prisoner what had brought him to town, when he replied that he had come to complain of his master, and witness then sent him to the Landdrost’s office. Prisoner made the same state- ment to witness as to Greeff, and added that he heard his master say he was wounded ; and that he had in consequence come to town to complain. Two Slaves, named Silvia and Candace, were examined respecting the statement of prisoner, that he had gone to a brook where they were washing, and had shown them the wound in his head, and told them how he had received it ; but nothing was elicited ; the last-mentioned, in reply to a question from the Guardian, said, that he did not mention any thing on the subject, nor did she see him wash any handkerchief, but that he asked her for a small piece of bread (which she gave him), drank some water and went away. The Court adjourned. 24th April 1827 : — Proceedings in the case of Lodewyk being this day resumed, His Majesty’s Fiscal, after citing the law in cases where a Slave should lift his hand against his master, and stating the punishment to be death ; and having remarked upon the several points in evidence, claimed that the prisoner be hanged by the neck until dead, or such other mitigated punishment as the Court may think proper. The prisoner’s defence was ably conducted by Mr. Advocate De Wet, who contended that the evidence of Mentor ought not to be received, as he was an interested witness, his master having promised him his freedom ; that the criminal law required that there should be two witnesses to convict a prisoner capitally ; that the law by which the penalty of death was awarded to a Slave striking his master had been for a long time in disuse ; that the circumstances of the colony were much changed, as the population had so much increased ; and that this case was not of such atrocity as to call for so severe a punishment, even if the Slave had struck his master in the manner alleged, which however he contended had not been proved, and he therefore prayed that the claim of the Fiscal should be rejected, with costs. The Court was cleared for deliberation, and on being reopened, sentence of death was passed upon the prisoner. (Vide 23 June of this Report.) March 19, 1827. His Majesty’s Fiscal, versus Lodewyk, Slave of Coenrad Hendrik Laubscher, senior. On a complaint of his master, that he, Lodewyk, had struck him several blows about the face and head, either with his fist or some hard substance inclosed within his hand, by which said Laubscher was severely cut and bruised. The prisoner, having heard the charge, stated, that his master having slept the whole night in his waggon, which was outspanned, (unteamed, and the horses allowed to graze,) at the Drie Fonteinen, on getting up, on a Friday morning, called him to put on his shoes ; and that whilst he was so doing, his master said that he hurt his foot, which was sore, and thereupon kicked him violently in the throat, and struck him several blows ; and on coming down from the waggon, was reaching his gun, when he (prisoner) being apprehensive that his master intended to shoot him, clasped him round the body to prevent him ; when he, Laub- scher, in consequence of the horses moving on, fell against some of the iron work of the waggon, by which his face was much cut and bruised. That he (the prisoner,) seeing this, ran off, to get out of the reach of the gun, saying at the same time, that he did not intend to desert, but that he knew where he would go, meaning, that he would go to Cape Town to complain of his master’s ill-usage (showing at the same time a wound on his head, which he stated to haAm been inflicted by his master with the thick end of the waggon whip ;) that he did accordingly come to town for that purpose, when Mr. Servaas de Kock caused him to be apprehended ; said Laub- scher having previously arrived in town, and lodged his com- plaint at the Landdrost’s office. Prisoner objected to the Slave boy Mentor of complainant, being admitted as a witness, on the ground that his master had promised him his freedom. Coenrad Hendrik Laubscher, (the complainant), stated in substance as follows : That he was on his way from Cape Town to his farm, and having slept in his waggon during the night between the 8th and 9th of January, was getting up in the morning, when he called prisoner, who was helping to harness the horses, to put the shoe on his left foot, he having a bad leg ; in doing which Lodewyk hurt him very much, and on being asked, why he did so ? answered impertinently that he had not hurt him ; when he, complainant, told him he deserved nothing better than a kick for his insolence. That being about to start on his journey, he wished first to get down from his waggon, and being infirm from the sore on his leg, he was getting down from the back part with his face tOwards the waggon, when just as he was about to put his foot to the ground, the prisoner cried out, “ What will you now do to me ? ” and instantly struck him a violent blow on the forehead, from the effect of which he immediately fell to the ground ; and AA'hen in the act of rising, he was again knocked down by the prisoner, who then struck him several more blows on the face, by which he was severely bruised. That upon getting up again, he called to the boy Mentor, who was at the head of the horses, to give him the whip, which he was doing, when the horses first began to move on ; and he, complainant, having caught hold of the whip by the small end, made a blow at the prisoner, which might possibly have reached him ; in so doing however, the whip broke, and Lodewyk laid hold of the thick end, when he, complainant, called to Mentor, to make the reins fast, and to endeavour to secure him by the legs. Prisoner however went away a short distance, and turning round, said, it was of little consequence whether he died today or to- morrow, and began feeling in his pockets as if for a knife, upon which, and not before, he, Laubscher, got down his gun from the waggon, and went in search of Lodewyk, but it being a misty morning, he could not find him. That in consequence of these circumstances he returned to Cape Town, to represent them to the Landdrost. On being questioned by the Guardian, complainant denied having struck or kicked the prisoner ; and stated that his conduct was generally good, but that during the whole of this last journey to Cape Town, he had not behaved well. Mentor, Slave of complainant, stated the case nearly as said Laubscher had done ; adding that his master promised him his freedom, when he called him to assist in securing Lodewyk. In answer to questions put by the Guardian, witness said, that he did not see his master strike or kick Lodewyk when he put on his shoe, but that it might have happened without his seeing it. Witness saw Lodewyk strike his master in the face as he was getting down from the waggon, but the horses beginning to move on just at that time, he fell towards the waggon with his face downwards ; and further, that when Lodewyk struck complainant, he did not perceive that he had any thing in his hand, but thinks he struck him with his fist only. Lodewyk having in the course of his statement mentioned, that on his way to Cape Town, he had gone to a brook near the Driefonteinen, where he had washed his handkerchief, which was bloody, and having found two women washing, he showed them the wound in his head, and told them how he had received it, the Court closed in order to consider the propriety of examining these women and other persons, and also to decide respecting the request of the Guardian, that a curator should be allowed for the defence of the prisoner, as the charge against him was, by the laws of the colony, of a capital nature. The Court having re-opened, it was resolved to cause the other witnesses to be summoned, and to appoint Mr. Advocate De Wet, curator for the prisoner. The Court then adjourned. 19th April 1827 : — The trial of Lodewyk was this day resumed, when the following persons were examined. Doctor Liesching deposed, that he had been called to examine the complainant, on his arrival at the Landdrost’s office, and considered that the wounds upon his face might have been occasioned by his falling upon some sharp substance, as well as from blows. Van Schalkwyk, field cornet of Groenkloof, declared, that all he knew of the case was from what he had been told by complainant. Louis Greeff deposed, that having heard Mr. Laubsclier’s complaint at the Landdrost’s office, he was afterwards standing on the steps of Servaas de Kock’s house, in Cape Toavii, when seeing the prisoner (whom he knew) passing by, he called to him, and asked him where he was going ; upon which prisoner said “ Have you not heard that my master was going to shoot me, and that I was obliged to strike him in my own defence ; ” and on being asked by witness on what part he had struck his master, he replied “ in the face.” Prisoner asked the witness if he meant positively to assert that he had told him that he had struck his master in the face ; to which Greeff answered, “ yes ; you did say so, and that your master fell in consequence, and on getting up, called Mentor to give him the whip, with which you said he struck you on the head, and called upon Mentor to help in securing you, promising at the same time to make him free.” Witness further deposed, that Lodewyk told him, that after the blows had passed, his master wished to get up into his waggon to reach his gun, and that he caught hold of him twice by the waist, and drew him back to prevent him from getting it. Servaas de Kock deposed, that having been informed by the preceding witness that the Slave Lodewyk, of Conrad Hendrik Laubscher, was at his door, he desired Greeff to keep him in conversation, and in the mean time sent for two constables ; upon the arrival of whom, witness asked the prisoner what had brought him to town, when he replied that he had come to complain of his master, and witness then sent him to the Landdrost’s office. Prisoner made the same state- ment to witness as to Greeff, and added that he heard his master say he was wounded ; and that he had in consequence come to town to complain. Two Slaves, named Silvia and Candace, were examined respecting the statement of prisoner, that he had gone to a brook where they were washing, and had shown them the wound in his head, and told them how he had received it ; but nothing was elicited ; the last-mentioned, in reply to a question from the Guardian, said, that he did not mention any thing on the subject, nor did she see him wash any handkerchief, but that he asked her for a small piece of bread (which she gave him), drank some water and went away. The Court adjourned. 24th April 1827 : — Proceedings in the case of Lodewyk being this day resumed, His Majesty’s Fiscal, after citing the law in cases where a Slave should lift his hand against his master, and stating the punishment to be death ; and having remarked upon the several points in evidence, claimed that the prisoner be hanged by the neck until dead, or such other mitigated punishment as the Court may think proper. The prisoner’s defence was ably conducted by Mr. Advocate De Wet, who contended that the evidence of Mentor ought not to be received, as he was an interested witness, his master having promised him his freedom ; that the criminal law required that there should be two witnesses to convict a prisoner capitally ; that the law by which the penalty of death was awarded to a Slave striking his master had been for a long time in disuse ; that the circumstances of the colony were much changed, as the population had so much increased ; and that this case was not of such atrocity as to call for so severe a punishment, even if the Slave had struck his master in the manner alleged, which however he contended had not been proved, and he therefore prayed that the claim of the Fiscal should be rejected, with costs. The Court was cleared for deliberation, and on being reopened, sentence of death was passed upon the prisoner. (Vide 23 June of this Report.) 
	

Coenrad Hendrik Laubscher is complainant in this one, in a matter of a dispute between him and his slave Lodewyk. Laubscher's charge is that Lodewyk struck him him several times in the head, either with his fist or a hard object enclosed in his hand.

Laubhscher is a senior citizen with a bad leg or foot. He has two slaves, Lodewyk and a boy Mentor, both present at the time of the incident. All three and additional witnesses gave testimony. Both Laubscher and Lodewyk had wounds on their head.

Where the testimonies agree: Laubscher was sitting in his wagon and called Lodewyk to help him put on his shoes. In so doing Lodewyk hurt Laubhscher's foot, and an altercation ensued. Laubscher went for his gun and Lodewyk ran away. Lodewyk showed his head wound to two women washing at a brook, then went to town to bring a complaint at the Landdrost's office. Laubscher had got to the Landrost's office first, where his complaint was heard by Greef. Lodewyk then arrived and talked to Greef on the steps of de Kock's house while de Kock called the police on Lodewyk. 

Where the testimonies differ:

Lodewyk says Laubscher said he hurt his foot while putting on his shoe and kicked him in the throat and struck him several times. Lodewyk saw Laubscher reaching for his gun and clasped him around the body to stop him. Laubscher fell and hit his face because the horses started moving, and Lodewyk ran away to escape Laubscher's gun, saying he would go to town to complain of Laubscher's abuse. On his way there Lodewyk showed his head wound to the two women at the brook and told them how he got it, and made it to town where he was apprehanded by de Kock, Laubscher having made it to down first and lodging a compaint witth the Landrost's office.

Laubscher says while helping him put on his shoe Lodewyk hurt him very much, asked Lodewyk why he hurt his foot and Lodewyk answered impertinently that he didn't, to which Laubshcer replied that he deserved a kick for his insolence. While Laubscher was getting off his wagon, Lodewyk cried "What will you now do to me?" and knocked him down with a blow to the forehead, then knocked him down again after he got up and hit him several more times in the face. Laubscher called for a whip to Mentor, who was at drivers seat for the horses, while the horses started to move. Laubscher attacked Lodewyk with the whip, which might have hit him but it broke. Laubscher asked Mentor to grab Lodewyk's legs but Lodewyk went away a short distance and said it didn't matter if he died today or tomorow and started reaching for a knife in his pocket, upon which Laubscher went for his gun. He went on search for Lodewyk but it was a misty morning so he couldn't find him. Upon being questioned, Laubscher denied kicking Lodwyk and said his conduct was generally good, but during his last journey to Cape Town he hadn't behaved well.

Mentor said "nearly the same" as Labuscher. He added that Laubscher had promised him his freedom when he called him to assist in securing Lodewyk. When questioned, Mentor said he did not see laubscher strike or kick Lodewyk, but it might have happened while he wasn't looking. He said he saw Lodewyk hit Laubscher as he was getting down from the wagon, but the horses started moving at that time and Laubscher fell face down. He did not see Lodewyk hit Laubscher with anything in his hand.

A doctor examined Laubscher's head wound and said it could be from falling on a sharp substance or from blows.

Louis Greeff was the one who heard Laubscher's complaint at the Landdrost's office. Greef said he was later standing on the steps of de Knock's house and saw Lodewyk (who he know) passing by. Greeff said he called to him and Lodewyk told him haven't you heard my master was going to shoot me and I struck him in self defense. Greeff said he asked Lodewyk where he struck him and Lodewyk replied "on the face." Upon hearing this at court, Lodewyk asked Greeff if he meant positively to assert  he told him he struck Laubscher on the face, and Greef answered yes, you said so, and that Laubscher fell, got up, called Mentor for the whip, with which you said he struck you on the head, then called Mentor to help while promising to make him free.

de Kock told court that when Greeff told him Lodewyk, of Conrad Labuscher, had arrived, he asked Greeff to talk to him and sent for the police. When they got there, de Kock asked Lodewyk why he was there. Lodewyk replied that he came to complain of Laubscher and Greeff sent him to the Landdrost's office. Lodewyk made the same statement to de Kock as to Greeff and added that he heard Laubscher say he was wounded and so came to town to complain.

From Silva and Candice, who were at the brook, "nothing was elicited," but when Candice was questioned she said Lodewyk didn't mention anything about the incident and didn't see him wash a handkerchief, but that he asked for a piece of bread, drank some water and left. 




Laubscher testimony has problems:


says whip attack "might have" hit Lodewyk, but if "might have not" then how did Lodewyk get his head wound? Also weird he says whip broke at that instant, among other improbable things in his testimony.

story that Lodewyk cried "what will you now do to me!" and started punching him in the face doesn't make any sense, nor does his story of Lodewyk moving away and declaring "I don't care if I live or die today!" Lodewyk comes off not insane, going to town to lodge complaint, asking Greeff if he wants to double-down on his testmimony, coming to court with witnesses and making arguments for his life (like pointing out problem with Mentor testimony given offer of freedom), which points to Lodewyk in fact caring if he "lived or died today."

Comes off as Laubscher needing to give excuse for grabbing his gun, that Lodewyk declared a death wish and reached for a knife in his pocket. Also giving excuse that hadn't behaved well last time in Cape Town but his "conduct was generally good."

Like Lodewyk pointed out, Mentor's testimony a problem since Mentor (who was a boy) was promised his freedom from a master who sometimes doesn't "behave well." If Mentor's testimony the same as Laubschers, starts to differ when questioned, saying maybe Laubscher kicked Lodewyk, that he fell when the wagon started to move, and he didn't see anything in Lodewyk's hand when he hit Laubscher.

Last point is important given that Laubscher had a gash in his head, but being hit by a fist wouldn't explain that. Laubscher said Lodewyk possibly had something hard in his hand while Lodewyck and Mentor said he fell when the wagon started to move.

On excuses in Laubscher's testimony, the "misty morning" also relevant. Why didn't Laubscher chase after him? Laubscher had a gun and surely could have apprehended him on account that he had horses and made it to town first. But important that Lodewyck (according to him) told Laubscher that he intended to go to the Landdrost's office, and apparently Laubscher's reaction was to get there quickly.

If not mistaken, a slave attacking someone and running away would be something for the police and sort-of an "emergency", while the Landdrost's office was used for disputes between slave-owners and slaves (see this on role of Landdrost in crimes: https://books.google.com/books?id=AMEbAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA25&lpg=PA25). So apparently Laubscher beleived Lodewyck when he said he didn't intend to run away and would go to the Landdrost's office, and cared more about what Lodewyck was going to say than him supposedly beating him and running away.

Maybe Laubscher would have other reasons to get to the Landdrost office first, because Greeff and de Kock acted strangely as well. de Kock and Greeff had already met with Laubscher, and when Lodewyck got there Greeff was already waiting on the steps. They had Greeff keep him busy while de Kock sent for the police. Greeff gives a testimony that's hearsay of Lodewyck, with Lodewyck challenging it in court asking him if he wanted to double-down that Lodewyck told him he struck Laubscher in the head. de Kock said Lodewyck told him same story he told Greeff (not sure what his addition means). It would be unusual for Lodewyck to go to town to tell an incriminating story to two officials then tell a different story in court.


What probably happened: Laubscher got angry at Lodewyck for hurting his foot and started attacking him. He fell of the wagon and got a gash in his face. At some point during this, Laubscher reached for his gun while Lodewyck was hitting him and trying to stop him. During the struggle, Laubscher asked Mentor for help, promising him his freedom.

Laubscher got his gun, and Lodewyck ran off saying he was going to the Landdrost's office. At this point, Laubscher realized he was in trouble. Though he wasn't "well behaved" before, he knew he might find some sympathetic officials at the Landdrost's office. He made sure to get there before Lodewyck, and met Greeff and de Kock, and they set up to wait for Lodewyck.

Lodewyck showed up, told Greeff and possibly de Kock his story, and was arrested before he could tell anybody else. At the trial, the boy Mentor told something "similar" to Laubscher's story with promises of his freedom, but cracked a little when questioned. When, after this and the doctor's report, it was clear at this point Mentor's testimony wasn't enough, Greeff and de Kock came in to give hearsay of Lodewyck's account that put words in his mouth. Silva and Candice, the only others to have heard Lodewyck's story before he was arrested, where one way or another made to be silent, and Greeff and de Kock's testimony settled the case.


this would explain why Laubscher had to make so many excuses, why he promised Mentor his freedom for help (if locked in struggle he started), why Mentor testimony same as Laubscher then starts to differ on questioning, why Lodewick thought he had a case with the Landdrost's office, why Laubscher went to Greeff and de Kock right away, and why they arrested him and gave different testimonies from Lodewyck.

Overall this fits with the rest of cases so far in here and how officials and slave-owners treated blacks


either way on this testimony Lodewyck was sentenced to death


Cape Colony was either a strange place where 13 year old African boys hang themselves, run into slave-owning boys holding knives, and African men start suddenly attacking their masters while yelling "I don't care if I live or die!" and reaching for a knife, or some kind of sadist haven horror show. System of law here completely inversed--should be that people enslaving and torturing people are put to death, instead the victims of such were put to death for trying to defend themselves.




------


https://www.koersjournal.org.za/index.php/koers/article/viewFile/720/833
	Shortly after Van Riebeeck had arrived at the Cape, the slave system was in­troduced in accordance with the policies of the Vereenigde Geoctroyeerde Oost- Indische Compagnie (the V.O.C.) (Worden, 1985:6-18; Hattingh, 1990:6-8). The attitude of the slave owners at the Cape towards slavery as an institution was strongly influenced by the fact that the V.O.C. permitted and afterwards regulated the slave system. They did not only accept the slave system as an officially en­dorsed institution, but also regarded their rights in terms thereof as sacred and inalienable. Worden's (1985:16) report is worth repeating:

		(Slavery) was perceived as an institution ordained by the ruling authority and accepted as such ... The first settlers accepted slaves in much the same way as they did land and seed. Even after slavery became well established, owners saw it as a system of labour maintained and supported by the go­vernment.


slavery was seen as a sacred an inalienable right by slave-owners in the cape

	
	It is therefore not surprising that later efforts by the British Government to im­prove the fate of the slaves at the Cape were vehemently resisted by the slave owners. It is also reported that the drive to end the slave system at the Cape was not supported by an Anti-Slavery Movement comparable to the movements in Britain (Watson, 1991:67-92). According to Watson (1991:6), this sentiment still has an effect on modem thinking in South Africa. Watson remarks that:

		(His study) does maintain that one principal source was the failure of early South African liberalism to develop over a century and a half either a sys­tematic and comprehensive ideology of human rights or a coherent move­ment to oppose the steady reduction of the rights of South Africans ... This failure, I believe, began with the Cape’s antislavery movement itself

	The only organised effort by whites to curb the effect of slavery at the Cape was the inception of the Cape of Good Hope Philanthropic Society for Aiding De­serving Slaves to Purchase their Freedom on 27 June 1828. The activities of the Society were sanctioned by Proclamation 70 of 3 February 1830 (Watson, 1991: 67-92). The Society’s contribution towards the ending of slavery at the Cape was a limited one. Not only did the Society allow its members to own slaves, but it also refrained from attacking the validity of slave property and from exposing the contradiction between Christian principles and slavery. It is also remarkable that the public debate on slavery at the Cape was a practical, and largely strategic, discussion. This discussion accepted the philosophical underpinning that proper­ty in humans was legitimate and that the right to liberty was subordinate to the right to property and the concomitant need to a secure labour supply. The diffi­culties experienced by clergymen to transform the debate to one regarding moral principles is aptly described by Watson (1991:193-194) as follows:

		Their views were complicated by the ideologies of their denomination or mission society, by the tensions between their secular and spiritual roles, and by their personal relations with their parishioners, both black and white.


Cape slave owners vehemently resisted British gov efforts to improve the fate of slaves

the gov sanctioned "Cape of Good Hope Philanthropic Society" was the only anti-slavery movement in Cape Colony and was very weak. The society allowed its members to own slaves and refrained from attacking the validity of holding slaves as property.

The public debate over slavery at the cape was a "practical" and "strategic" one that started from accepting right to liberty subordinate to property rights (O. F. Metzel an example of this? his contribution was about treatment of slaves and "sensible" vs. "unsensible" masters, said slaves were otherwise "happy").

The church had difficulties raising a moral debate about slavery (what was going on with that?)


	Apart from the attitude of the colonists at the Cape towards slavery, it is also im­portant to emphasise that there was a considerable difference between the de fac­to and de jure position of the slaves.

		Ross’s (1980:5) comments on the early legal system at the Cape caught my atten­tion. He remarks: South Africa was clearly ruled by a code of law ... and moreover by one which was based on a system to which more concentrated legal thought had been given, at a higher theoretical level, than any other in the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries.

	Slaves were not without any rights. Their limited rights were, however, suppres­sed by the realities to which they were subjected. Worden (1985:113) refers to one aspect of their subjugation in the following terms:

		(T)here were numerous means of evading the laws which were supposed to protect slave interests. As Le Vaillant commented after his visit in the early 1780’s, these wise laws do honour to the Dutch government, but how many ways are there to elude them.


There was a considerable difference between the de facto and de jure laws protecting slaves and many ways to edlude them


an example:


https://books.google.com/books?id=N7damlJZAkkC&pg=PA48&lpg=PA48
	he issued his ameioration proclamation in March 1823 ...Slave owners were not to punish their slaves beyond "a mild domestic correction," which could amount to twenty-five lashes with a whip.


https://archive.org/stream/recordsofcapecol00thea_20/recordsofcapecol00thea_20_djvu.txt
	...February 1, 1827. The Secretary of the Cape District versus Johannes Christian Kotze, Jan’s son. For severely flogging his female Slave Eva. Complainant stated, that she was making bread for the family, and told her mistress that there was so much barley to mix in it that it would not bind, which being represented to her master, he immediately got angry and called for a sambok, (a species of whip made from the hide of the hippopotamus or rhinoceros) with which he gave her 25 lashes, and within a short period 25 more, for which she could assign no reason. When she was flogged, her hands and legs were tied, and her hands being placed under her knees, a stick was passed between, and she was then thrown on the floor, and flogged on the back, shoulders and posteriors ; her clothes, however, being on. The medical certificate stated, that on examination there were found a considerable number of marks and stripes, some of which were in an ulcerated state, on her shoulders, back, posteriors and arms. The witnesses for defendant gave Eva a bad character. The prosecutor claimed that the complainant might be sold, and never again become the property of the defendant, or that of his wife, children, parents, brothers and sisters. The Court rejected the claim of the prosecutor, and sentenced the defendant to a fine of £30 sterling, with costs


law said can't whip more than 25 times, so he whips her 25 times, leaves and comes back and whips her 25 times again

why skirt the law just to whip someone 50 times? all this supposedly for mistake in the kitchen.

that needed law in the first place, it still got violated, and had a loophole says bad things about Cape Colony...


whole time public debate was "you know it really doesn't make any sense to be cruel to your slaves", yet they kept doing it


https://www.koersjournal.org.za/index.php/koers/article/viewFile/720/833
	Slaves themselves were under real pressure when it came to the enforcement of their limited rights. For instance the Statutes of Batavia (1766), which were ap­plied at the Cape, allowed slaves to report maltreatment and abuse, but also stipulated that when a complaint was unfounded, the slave would be whipped an returned to its master.2 The realities slaves faced at the courts, combined with the effect that a complaint would have on the master-slave relationship at home, forces one to conclude that only the most severe cases of maltreatment were reported (Ross, 1980:7; Dooling, 1991:80). I support the view expressed by Ross (1983:1)

		(T)here has never been ... a (slave) society that was not brutal in the extreme. A mild slave regime is a contradiction in terms. Slavery is a form of social oppression that is based on the use of force, which is always available to, and frequently employed by the slave-owning class to impress its will on the slaves. If, somewhere in the world, there exists a social institution that is called slavery in which brutality and denigration are absent, then the concept has been stretched so far as to be empty and meaningless...


1766 Cape law set up so that if slave complaint of maltreatment was found unfounded would be whipped and sent back to their master. Implications for master-slave treatment at home meant courts for slaves only used for most severe cases.

After reviewing the history of slavery in Cape Colony, author concluded that slavery and brutality and denigration go hand in hand.


	...Up to approximately 1827 the Court of Justice and the Court of Appeal did not record the reasons for their judgments (Botha, 1915:319, 323; Visagie, 1969:70). It is therefore almost impossible to comment on the legality of the submissions of counsel which, incidently, was documented in extenso, and in many cases sub­ stantiated with full details of relevant authorities. Until recently the accessibility of the records of the Court of Justice and the Court of Appeal also proved to be a major stumbling-block. Legal historians had to cope with the time-consuming and almost impossible task of working at random through the available and un- systematised documents and series.

	A very useful and, in my opinion, indispensable tool was developed by the re­ search team from UWC-PU for CHE for this purpose. This team recently pro­ duced an index of the civil cases of the Court of Justice and the Court of Appeal from 1806 to 1827. This computer based index allows legal historians direct ac­ cess to the documents containing the relevant data on any predetermined subject.


After British took over colony in 1795 ten 1806, they started keeping records on slave court cases. Until 1827 these courts didn't record the reasons for their judgements. Until recently (early 1990s) it was hard to access these documents, but some researches put them in a computer system.


	...Developments: 1806 to 1834

	When the British reoccupied the Cape in 1806 they pursued their well-known policy in respect of conquered or ceded colonies (Visagie, 1969:95-97; Van Zyl, 1907:132-135). For the Cape this policy meant that justice was to be adminis­tered in the same manner as had been customary until then, and according to the laws, statutes and ordinances which had been in force.

	At this stage the British Government was under great pressure from the Anti-Sla­very Movement to end slave trade in its territories. This was legislated in 1807, while the Anti-Slavery Movement continued their campaign now focusing on the abolition of all slavery (Hurwitz, 1973:21-76; Edwards, 1942:33-63, 81-90, 111- 150).

	As indicated above, the British authorities had to take cognisance of various sources of the slave law at the Cape in their efforts to accommodate the interests of the slave community. There is definite proof that they took up this challenge. Not only were the Fiscal and Attorney-General requested to provide details of the legal position of the slaves13, but at least two sets of documents in the CapeArchives14 also prove that the authorities had the desire to acquaint themselves with the details of the relevant provisions. In the Archives there is a handwritten copy of the Alphabetical Version of the New Statutes o f Batavia in English as well as a list of the local placaats relevant to the slave community.

	The British efforts to limit the number of slaves at the Cape date back to 1795. During the British occupation of 1795 to 1803 special permission, which was granted only under special circumstances, was required for the importation of slaves (Latsky, 1943:5-8; Stockenstróm, 1934:23-29; Edwards, 1942:34-36, 47- 54). After slave trade had been prohibited in British territories in 1807 (Clarkson, 1968:Vol II 506-508, 576-587), the Government at the Cape had to attend to the real danger of the enslavement o f the indigenous people. This threat urged the authorities to promulgate a number of ordinances15 which legislated the movement, employment, land ownership and residence of the Khoisan. As pressure mounted from the Anti-Slavery Movement in Britain and its affiliates at the Cape, these laws became controversial, and were often described as justifying the slavery o f indigenous people (Edwards, 1942:51-63; Van der Merwe, 1984: 149-151). There can be little doubt that these early laws introduced into our history the concept of group areas and pass laws.


British kept Dutch slave law when they took Cape in 1806

Abolition movement ended slave trade around this time and went on to try to end all slavery (colonies in particular or slavery in general?)

After the end of the slave trade, some cape colonists looked for labor among neighboring nations. The laws passed ostensibly to protect these people ended up making this easier


https://books.google.com/books?id=xXN0AwAAQBAJ&pg=PT175&lpg=PT175
	The 'Hottentot Proclamation' of 1809 sought to safeguard Khoikhoi


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Hottentot_Proclamation
	The Hottentot Proclamation ... was the first of a series of laws that sought to restrict the rights of the Khoikhoi 


https://books.google.com/books?id=R5jkCwAAQBAJ&pg=PT35&lpg=PT35
	The Hottentot Proclamation was issued by the Earl of Caledon, third British Governor of the Cape. This notorious piece of colonial legislation for the first time permitted the Khoisan to be legally indentured. The measure attempted, and failed, to address two irreconcilable problems. The colony had a laobour shortage, exacerbated by the abolition of the slave trade in 1808. White Boers in particular, still bitter about the Khoisan rebellion of 1799-1803, complained about the labour scaricty. Simultaneously, missionaries protested about the Khoisan's social and economic conditions, and aruged for improvements in their judicial status. Inevitably, the effects of the Hottentot Proclamation proved contradictory. Ostensibly, it tried to improve the legal status of the Khoisan by including them under the rule of law, but in doing so, it introduced draconian constraints on their movements and gave white master unprecedented legal control over their Khoisan servants.

	Hendrik and Anna Catharina were now required to ifficially register all Khoisan members of their household. In compliance with the proclamation, Saartjie was taken before a magisrate and formally indentured as a 'Hottentot' servant. Technically, this formal registration entitled her to a wage and some basic conditions of employment. In reality, the colonial governments put little effort into monitoring the now 'protected' interests of the Khoisan. In the Proclamation's revealing words, the Prospero-like Lord Caledon 'extend [ed] his peculiar protection in nature of a guardian over the Hottentot nation under this government, by reaons of their general imbecile state'. Saartjie was now more vulnerable to exploitation, as well as being subject to the authority of an absolute paternalism allgedly designed to protect her welfare.


------


https://www.koersjournal.org.za/index.php/koers/article/viewFile/720/833
	On the other hand, efforts were made by o f the British Government to improve the fate of the slave community. To the dismay of local slave owners a number of Proclamations were promulgated in pursuance of this goal.16 

	...16 See for instance the Proclamation of 26 April 1816; the Proclamation of 18 March 1823; Ordinance 19 of 1826 and the Consolidated Order of 1830.


April 1816 Proclomation (or at leasts parts of it) ended up angering slave owners without helping slaves:

	
	...	The compulsory registration of slaves was also legislated.19 This legislation proved to be impractical and caused resentment among the slave-owning com­munity (Latsky, 1943:27-29).20 Their opposition was aggravated because the Court of Justice was instructed to take into account the fact whether or not a slave was registered when his or her freedom was at stake. This legislation did not contribute substantially towards the improvement of the position of the slave community. Slave registers proved to be outdated and unreliable while the unenviable position of slaves before the courts remained essentially unchanged.


important for context:

https://www.thedailybeast.com/how-blacks-freed-themselves-from-slavery?ref=author
	In 1804, enslaved Haitians succeeded in beating back the French, British, and Spanish empires to establish the world’s first black republic. Haiti’s existence represents “the turning point” for the antislavery movement, Davis writes, raising the previously unthinkable prospect of immediate emancipation into a full-fledged reality. Until Haiti, abolitionists focused on either gradual emancipation, or simply ending the slave trade, not slavery itself. Haiti changed that. In the short term, however, the Haitian Revolution actually slowed the official antislavery campaign. And slavery’s defenders quickly turned Haiti into an axe to bludgeon the abolitionist movement: give slaves even the slightest bit of hope, and they’ll insist on immediate freedom.


https://www.encyclopedia.com/history/encyclopedias-almanacs-transcripts-and-maps/haitian-revolution


Hatian revolution helped kick-off empancipation movement, and also reactionaries against it. In politics, emancipation became long torturous fight where it ended up being implemented piecemeal over 30 years (60 counting America).

Abolishioninst movement in Britain sometimes had weak, ineffectual, destructive, or treasonous leaders (including Wilberforce):


http://spartacus-educational.com/REwilberforce.htm
	William Wilberforce, only son of Robert Wilberforce (1728–1768) and Elizabeth Bird (1730–1798), was born in Kingston upon Hull on 24th August 1759. His paternal grandfather, William Wilberforce (1690–1776), established the family fortunes through the Baltic trade and was twice mayor of Hull. (1)

	...Wilberforce was not an active member of the House of Commons and did not make his first speech until May 1781 when he argued that the proposed legislation, the Prevention of Smuggling Act, that "it would not only be severe, but unjust to confiscate the vessel" of a captain involved in these illegal trade. The second speech also reflected the interests of his electors when he requested government contracts for Hull. In fact he spent most of his time at the three most important gentlemen's clubs, White's, Boodle's and Brooks's, in London. (9) 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/White%27s
	White's is the oldest gentleman's club in London, founded in 1693, and is widely considered to be the most exclusive private club in the world.[1][2] Notable current members include Charles, Prince of Wales, Prince William, Duke of Cambridge, Conrad Black and Tom Stacey. Former British Prime Minister David Cameron was formerly a member for fifteen years but resigned in 2008, despite his father Ian Cameron having previously been the club's chairman, over the club's declining to admit women.[3][4][5][6][7] White's continues to maintain its standards as an establishment exclusively for gentlemen; brief exceptions were made for the visits by Queen Elizabeth II in 1991[7] and 2016.

	...White's quickly made the transition from teashop to exclusive club and in the early 18th century, it was notorious as a gambling house; those who frequented it were known as "the gamesters of White's." The club gained a reputation for both its exclusivity and the often raffish behaviour of its members. Jonathan Swift referred to White's as the "bane of half the English nobility."[9]

	...Alvanley's was not the most eccentric bet in White's famous betting book. Some of those entries were on sports, but more often on political developments, especially during the chaotic years of the French Revolution and the Napoleonic Wars.

	...The Club bar is more compact than that of other clubs. An amusing description of it and the rationale behind its size may be found in Chapter Ten of the spy novel The Sixth Column (1951) by Peter Fleming (brother of Ian Fleming)


https://www.theguardian.com/books/2014/apr/18/cambridge-spy-ring-what-biographers-say
	Elliott could not believe, until the evidence was compelling, that Philby, a member of the Athenaeum (adjoining the Travellers) was a Soviet spy. Sir Stewart Menzies, head of MI6 at the time and staunch defender of Philby when confronted by MI5's suspicions, was a member of White's club, and as Macintyre observes, "rode to hounds, mixed with royalty, never missed a day at Ascot, [and] drank a great deal ..."


https://books.google.com/books?id=_bV5ncXNke4C&pg=PA3&lpg=PA3
	Where the Chief of the Secret Intelligence Service (MI6), Major-General Sir Stewart Menzies (pronounced 'Mingiss'), celebrated 'Victory in Europe' (VE) day is not known, but it is more than likely that he was standing at the bar of White's Club in St James's where too much of the informal business of intelligence work was still undertaken.


https://www.amazon.com/History-British-Secret-Service-Standard/dp/0586051163/ref=pd_cp_14_1?_encoding=UTF8&pd_rd_i=0586051163&pd_rd_r=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18&pd_rd_w=HvE4s&pd_rd_wg=4yHhn&psc=1&refRID=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18
	A History of the British Secret Service

	A new type of amateur spy became evident in the middle of the eighteenth century, similar to the Elizabethean scholar who travelled widely and sent back intelligence reports to his country. But in the eighteenth century such matters were relatively worse organized than in the sixteenth century and the impetus for such matters came from the travellers themselves rather than from the Secret Service in London. The new amateur spy was the young aristocrat or scion of the upper middle classes who made the Grand Tour of Europe to complete his education. It was an age in which secret societies and clubs sprang up all over England. As the brothers Goncourt wrote in the same century, 'if two Englishmen were to be cast aside on an unihabited island, their first consideration would be the formation of a club'.

	...Many of these clubs took on a definite political hue, some were even bigotedly political in their choice of members, while there were a few devoted to subversive activities which attracted the attention of the Secret Service.

	...perhaps the most remarkable of all these clubs and certainly the one which enjoyed the greatest notoriety was that entitled the 'Knights of Saint Francis of Wycombe', often errenously reffered to as the 'Hell-Fire Club'.


https://books.google.com/books?id=j-bDYtcoG9IC&pg=PA39&lpg=PA39
	An incident related by George Selwyn - the well-known wit and member of the infamous Hellfire Club - describes what Wilberforce was like when out on the town. One night in the early 1780s Selwyn was leaving the House of Commons when he passed a roomful of young men "who made me, from their life and spirit, wish for one night to be twenty. There was a table full of them drinking - young Pitt, Lord Euston, Barkley, North, etc. etc. staging and laughing... Some of them sang very good catches: one Wilberforce, a Member of Parliament sang the best."


https://www.amazon.com/History-British-Secret-Service-Standard/dp/0586051163/ref=pd_cp_14_1?_encoding=UTF8&pd_rd_i=0586051163&pd_rd_r=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18&pd_rd_w=HvE4s&pd_rd_wg=4yHhn&psc=1&refRID=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18
	This club was founded by the squire of West Wycombe, Sir Francis Dashwood, a rake-hell and flamboyant character, who, for a brief period, was chancellor of the Exchequer. At one time some of the most influential of Cabinet Ministers were members of this strange club which used to meet first in Medmenham Abbey on the Thames and later in caves carved out of West Wycombe Hill underneath the church.

	...A shocked public learned that its political leaders had for years been masquerading in the semi-ruined Abbey of Medmenham. Not only had they dressed up as 'monks' and indulged in mysterious rites, but they had admitted to their strange society masked and hooded women whom they were pleased to call 'nuns'. When the secret of Medmenham became known, this rakes' club transferred its headquarters to caves cut deep into the heart of West Wycombe Hill.


https://books.google.com/books/about/The_Hell_fire_Clubs.html?id=Q1djQgAACAAJ
	The Hell-fire Clubs: A History of Anti-morality

	The Hell-Fire Clubs conjure up images of aristocratic rakes outraging respectability at every turn, cutting a swath through the village maidens and celebrating Black Masses. While all this is true, it is not the whole story. The author of this volume has assembled an account of the Clubs and of their antecedents and descendants. At the centre of the book is the principal brotherhood, known by the Hell-Fire name - Sir Francis Dashwood's notorious Monks of Medmenham, with their strange rituals and initiation rites, library of erotica and nun companions recruited from the brothels of London.


https://www.amazon.com/History-British-Secret-Service-Standard/dp/0586051163/ref=pd_cp_14_1?_encoding=UTF8&pd_rd_i=0586051163&pd_rd_r=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18&pd_rd_w=HvE4s&pd_rd_wg=4yHhn&psc=1&refRID=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18
	...Most of the legends surrounding this club - that it's members practised black magic and celebrated black masses in Medmenham Abbey and in the caves - are quit erroneous and the result of malicious propaganda by political opponents of its leading members.


https://books.google.com/books?id=nOSGCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA11&lpg=PA11
	The excess of the Hellfire Club led to a ressurrection of the Society for the Reformation of Manners in the 1750s. It had first started in the 1690s and had been active in the early years of George I in bringing prosecutions against the owners of brothels and molly houses (where homosexuals held their meetings). Later, its activities were subsumed in the Society for the Suppression of Vice set up by William Wilberforce in 1787.


https://www.jstor.org/stable/2638853?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
	...The particular forms of vice which the founds of the society selected for suppression they eventually listed as follows: profanation of the Lord's Day and profane swearing; publication of blasphemous, licentious and obscene books and prints; selling by false weights and measures; keeping of disorderly public houses, brothers, and gaming houses; procuring; illegal lotteries; cruelty to animals. In their early years of activity members of the society had to face a considerable amount of hostility and ridicule.

	Yet existing accounts of the Vice Society's early activities remain vague, incomplete and sometimes contradictory, even on basic issues. Who, for example, founded the society? (Historians have commonly, though not unanimously, assumed the founders to be evangelicals acting under guidance, or at least inspiration, from William Wilberforce and the 'Clapham Sect'.)  More generally, what were the motives of the founders? Why did they choose to define vice in the way that they did?


https://www.amazon.com/History-British-Secret-Service-Standard/dp/0586051163/ref=pd_cp_14_1?_encoding=UTF8&pd_rd_i=0586051163&pd_rd_r=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18&pd_rd_w=HvE4s&pd_rd_wg=4yHhn&psc=1&refRID=KJVV5AXD8YDTGEXBJH18
	...But there is no doubt at all that it was infiltrated by secret agents, both British and foreign, because it made an admirable listening post. The British agents used it as a club where valuable intelligence could occasionally be obtained when the wine flowed freely and also to exploit the club for political ends.

	...It would be in keeping with his fondness for amorous adventure that he used his disguise to seduce the Czarina Anne, a liason which is said to have been maintained for some moths.

	...It was, however, the ability of Dashwood to make friends with the females at the Russian court which enabled him to set up what until then London had lacked, agents in St Petersburg who could supply intelligence. he wormed his way into the confidence of the Grand Duchess Catherine, thus paving the war for further consolidation of Anglo-Russian relations by Ambassador Sir Charles Hanbury-Williams. There are also indications that Dashwood was active as a British spy in italy, though Horace Mann, the head of British espionage in Rome, sent home reports complaining that Dashwood was 'a Jacobite agent'


https://world.pulse.rs/the-hellfire-club/
	...the best known branch of the club was founded by Sir Francis Dashwood, around 1749 in England. Later, there was close cooperation between the club of  Sir Francis Dashwood and famous Brook’s club, which was considered one of the most famous so-called gentleman clubs


https://books.google.com/books?id=T-8LbCrAng0C&pg=PT8&lpg=PT8
	Wilberforce was a man who was very gifted. He had a natural charm; he was very amusing; he was quick-witted; he had a good singing voice. But he devoted his early life to having a good time, to pleasure. He had a lot of fun. He had a good group of friends and they liked to play cards, to gamble, to wine and dine. He belonged to five London Clubs. He was a bit of a dillittante.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Society_of_Dilettanti
	The group, initially led by Francis Dashwood, contained several dukes and was later joined by Joshua Reynolds, David Garrick, Uvedale Price and Richard Payne Knight, among others. It was closely associated with Brooks's, one of London's most exclusive gentlemen's clubs.


https://books.google.com/books?id=T-8LbCrAng0C&pg=PT8&lpg=PT8
	Then at the age of twenty-one he entered politics. Some time later Pitt and Wilberforce (who were both the same age) were discussing the future of their careers at Brooks's club in London.


https://books.google.com/books?id=J6BnSZoSMAYC&pg=PA278&lpg=PA278
	Brooks's Club, founded in 1764, is the oldest of the surviving clubs in London, and one of the first to have permanent rooms; the current building dates from 1778. On my visit, somewhat to my surprise a very amicable attendant named Alistair showed me around the upstairs parlor. They had an original wooden gaming table from the club's earliest days, with a semicircle cut into it to accomodate the girth of Charles James Fox, an eager but obese card player. The walls were decorated with oil portraits of the first Dilettanti Society members in fancy dress. Today, the twelve members of the society still meet at Brooks's Club every three moths; the initiation rites, devised by Sir Francis Dashwood, are still secret, although it is known that they involve fancy dress.


https://books.google.com/books?id=4MdlAgAAQBAJ&pg=PT23&lpg=PT23
	More important to his career was the exclusive clubs of St. James's. As a man of the mercantile class Wilberforce would never make his way in the Commons without full acceptance in the clubs. He told his sons of the first time he entered Broks's, a greenhorn from the province who knew scarcely anyone above the rank of private gentleman or baronet; how he stood uncomfortably watching the faro, a complicated form of betting on cards which was not a game of skill like whist or piquet, and starting gaming from shyness more than pleasure. An acquantance who had not heard of his election to the club came in and said he was glad to see him. 'Oh, don't interrupt him,' said old George Agustus Selwyn, the well-known wit, who was keeping the bank and thus stood to win the most. 'He is very well employed.' 'They considered me as a fine fat pigeon whom they might pluck,' chucked Wilberforce.

	It was a good story. But in fact he was not elected one of the three hundred members of Brooks's until 7 April 1783 when he was fully established as a popular young men about town, though it is possible he had not played faro. He was already a member of White's across the street, since 1781: later he became its chairman. His election to White's proved that he had overcome Society's contempt for fortunes founded in 'Trade' rather than the land, and the elderly Duke of Norfolk did not think it odd to lose £100 to the merchant's son.


https://books.google.com/books?id=T-8LbCrAng0C&pg=PT8&lpg=PT8
	Then something happened, over a period of months, when he was twenty-five. He describes it as 'The Great Change'. Basically, he fell in love with Jesus Christ. From that moment on, to use his own words, quoting the book of Hebrews, he 'fixed his eyes on Jesus' (Hebrews 12:2). His relationship with Jesus Christ became the number one priority in his life.


http://spartacus-educational.com/REwilberforce.htm
	...Wilberforce contemplated giving up politics for a life as a clergyman. John Newton, a former slave-trader, who had become a devout Christian, persuaded Wilberforce that he could serve God better by remaining in Parliament and campaigning for social reform. Wilberforce renounced all "things of the flesh". He resigned from all his gentlemen clubs and "exchanged his socializing and entertaining for one of reflection and re-evaluation".

	...The House of Commons agreed to establish a committee to look into the slave trade. Wilberforce said he did not intend to introduce new testimony as the case against the trade was already in the public record. Ellen Gibson Wilson, a leading historian on the slave trade has argued: "Everyone thought the hearing would be brief, perhaps one sitting. Instead, the slaving interests prolonged it so skilfully that when the House adjourned on 23 June, their witnesses were still testifying." (30)


https://www.amazon.co.uk/Great-Abolition-Sham-Story-British/dp/0750934905/ref=sr_1_13?ie=UTF8&s=books&qid=1224608187&sr=1-13
	The Great Abolition Sham

	...It is a dramatic and suspenseful story, with opposition from expected and unexpected quarters and internal squabbling and falling-out. MP William Wilberforce brought in a Private Member's Bill for the abolition of the slave trade every year for eighteen years, but it was the movement on the ground that turned public opinion. 


http://spartacus-educational.com/REwilberforce.htm
	...On 18th April 1791 Wilberforce introduced a bill to abolish the slave trade. Wilberforce was supported by William Pitt, William Smith, Charles Fox, Richard Brinsley Sheridan, William Grenville and Henry Brougham. The opposition was led by Lord John Russell and Colonel Banastre Tarleton, the MP for Liverpool. There was no reasoned justification of slavery or the slave-trade. Thomas Grosvenor, the MP for Chester, acknowledged that it was "not an amiable trade but neither was the trade of a butcher an amiable trade, and yet a mutton chop was, nevertheless, a good thing." One observer commented that it was "a war of the pigmies against the giants of the House". However, on 19th April, the motion was defeated by 163 to 88. (38) 

	...In March 1796, Wilberforce's proposal to abolish the slave trade was defeated in the House of Commons by only four votes. At least a dozen abolitionist MPs were out of town or at the new comic opera in London. Thomas Clarkson commented: "To have all our endeavours blasted by the vote of a single night is both vexatious and discouraging." Wilberforce wrote in his diary: "Enough at the Opera to have carried it. Very much vexed and incensed at our opponents". (41) 

	...William Wilberforce introduced an abolition bill on 30th May 1804. It passed all stages in the House of Commons and on 28th June it moved to the House of Lords. The Whig leader in the Lords, Lord Grenville, said as so many "friends of abolition had already gone home" the bill would be defeated and advised Wilberforce to leave the vote to the following year. Wilberforce agreed and later commented "that in the House of Lords a bill from the House of Commons is in a destitute and orphan state, unless it has some peer to adopt and take the conduct of it". (44) 

	In February 1805, Wilberforce presented his eleventh abolition bill to the House of Commons. Charles Brooke reported that the French slave trade was resurgent, so that abolition would merely hand British commerce over to the enemy. Wilberforce replied: "The opportunity now offered may never return, and if the present moment be neglected, events may occur which render the whole of the West India islands one general scene of devastation and horror. The storm is fast gathering; every instant it becomes blacker and blacker. Even now I know not whether it be too late to avert the impending evil, but of this I am quite sure - that we have no time to lose." This time the pro-slave trade MPs were better organised and it was defeated by seven votes. (45) 



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Haitian_Revolution
	The Haitian Revolution (French: Révolution haïtienne [ʁevɔlysjɔ̃ ajisjɛ̃n]) was a successful anti-slavery and anti-colonial insurrection by self-liberated slaves against French colonial rule in Saint-Domingue, now the sovereign nation of Haiti. It began on 22 August 1791 at 22:00,[3] and ended in 1804 with the former colony's independence.


http://spartacus-educational.com/REwilberforce.htm
	...This time there was little opposition and the bill was passed by an overwhelming 114 to 15. In the House of Lords Lord Greenville made a passionate speech that lasted three hours where he argued that the trade was "contrary to the principles of justice, humanity and sound policy" and criticised fellow members for "not having abolished the trade long ago". Ellen Gibson Wilson has pointed out: "Lord Grenville ... opposed a delaying inquiry but several last-ditch petitions came from West Indian, London and Liverpool shipping and planting spokesmen.... He was determined to succeed and his canvassing of support had been meticulous." When the vote was taken the bill was passed in the House of Lords by 41 votes to 20. (48)

	Wilberforce now spent his energies developing the Sierra Leone Company as a foundation for disseminating Christianity and civilization in Africa. It has been argued by Stephen Tomkins that during this period "Wilberforce... allowed the abolitionist colony of Sierra Leone... to use slave labour and buy and sell slaves.... After abolition, the British navy patrolled the Atlantic seizing slave ships. The crew were arrested, but what to do with the African captives? With the knowledge and consent of Wilberforce and friends, they were taken to Sierra Leone and put to slave labour in Freetown. They were called 'apprentices', but they were slaves. The governor of Sierra Leone paid the navy a bounty per head, put some of the men to work for the government, and sold the rest to landowners. They did forced labour, under threat of punishment, without pay, and those who escaped to neighbouring African villages to work for wages were arrested and brought back". (49)

	...It gradually became clear that there were serious problems with the Abolition of the Slave Trade Act. British captains who were caught continuing the trade were fined £100 for every slave found on board. However, this law did not stop the British slave trade. In fact, the situation became worse. Now that the supply had officially ceased, the demand grew and with it the price of slaves. For high prices the traders were prepared to take the additional risks. If slave-ships were in danger of being captured by the British navy, captains often reduced the fines they had to pay by ordering the slaves to be thrown into the sea. (52) 

	...Some people involved in the anti-slave trade campaign such as Thomas Fowell Buxton, argued that the only way to end the suffering of the slaves was to make slavery illegal. "I now regret that I and those honourable friends who thought with me on this subject have not before attempted to put an end, not merely to the evils of the slave trade, but to the evils of slavery itself." (54)

	Wilberforce disagreed, he believed that at this time slaves were not ready to be granted their freedom. He pointed out in A Letter on the Abolition of the Slave Trade, Addressed to the Freeholders and other inhabitants of Yorkshire that: "It would be wrong to emancipate (the slaves). To grant freedom to them immediately, would be to insure not only their masters' ruin, but their own. They must (first) be trained and educated for freedom." (55)  

	...In 1824 Elizabeth Heyrick published her pamphlet Immediate not Gradual Abolition. In her pamphlet Heyrick argued passionately in favour of the immediate emancipation of the slaves in the British colonies. This differed from the official policy of the Anti-Slavery Society that believed in gradual abolition. She called this "the very masterpiece of satanic policy" and called for a boycott of the sugar produced on slave plantations. (58)

	In the pamphlet Heyrick attacked the "slow, cautious, accommodating measures" of the leaders like Wilberforce. "The perpetuation of slavery in our West India colonies is not an abstract question, to be settled between the government and the planters; it is one in which we are all implicated, we are all guilty of supporting and perpetuating slavery. The West Indian planter and the people of this country stand in the same moral relation to each other as the thief and receiver of stolen goods". (59) 

	The leadership of the organisation attempted to suppress information about the existence of this pamphlet and William Wilberforce gave out instructions for leaders of the movement not to speak on the same platforms as Heyrick and other women who favoured an immediate end to slavery. 


https://www.theguardian.com/uk/2010/aug/02/wilberforce-condoned-slavery-files-claim
	William Wilberforce 'condoned slavery', Colonial Office papers reveal

	...Colonial Office papers for Sierra Leone, the free colony established by Wilberforce and his "Clapham Sect" of social reformers as an ideal society where races mixed and slaves were free, reveal that slavery – albeit renamed "apprenticeship" – continued long after the 1807 act abolishing slave trading, with Wilberforce's knowledge.

	His condoning of the practice and his collusion in keeping it quiet conspired to ensure that Sierra Leone's capital, Freetown, would be the last place in the British empire where Africans could still be legally bought and sold into forced labour.

	...As directors of the Sierra Leone Company, Wilberforce and his coterie effectively ran the colony. After the 1807 Slave Trade Act, which abolished the slave trade but not slavery, the Royal Navy started intercepting slaving ships, arresting crews and rescuing slaves.

	But, what to do with the rescued slaves? "They could have set them free. But what they did was hand them over to the authorities in Freetown," said Tomkins. Sierra Leone became a crown colony in 1808, but was still managed by Wilberforce and his friends. "So with their knowledge, and their acquiescence, the navy would hand the slaves over. Some the colony kept themselves, others they sold to landowners and they put them to slave labour."

	...Men and children were "indentured" for $20. Women were given away. They did not call them slaves, they were "apprentices" – not purchased, but "redeemed".

	They received no wages, just food. And those that escaped were recaptured, in irons. The only distinction between them as "slaves" and as "apprentices", was that they must be freed after 14 years.

	...The then governor of Sierra Leone, Thomas Perronet Thompson, a 25-year-old lieutenant, was so appalled he begged Wilberforce for an explanation. "I wish I had time to go into particulars respecting the difficulties which forced us into acquiescing in the system of apprenticing," was Wilberforce's reply.

	Thompson maintained that Wilberforce and the Sierra Leone Company had "by means of their agents become slave traders themselves". He threatened to blow the whistle, so he was sacked, with Wilberforce himself agreeing to the dismissal.

	"There is something deeply disappointing about it all," said Tomkins.



the next major revolt was in Barbados in 1816, which failed, and that was kicked off by the slave registration proclamation which applied to all colonies as well as Cape Colony.

https://books.google.com/books?id=UeHWAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA96&lpg=PA96


it also led to a debate on whether or not the revolt was fomented by evil British abolishionists or anti-abolishionists

https://books.google.com/books?id=UeHWAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA98&lpg=PA98
	The African Institute did not support the rebellion, and was as 'racist' in its views of the slaves as the planter-assemblymen. Neither did King Henry of Haiti express any specific concern for assisting the rebellion. The document of the African Institute on the rebellion, published in 1816, stated the following:

		If we suppose the generality of the slaves so wretchedly low in information in intellect as not to perceive the insanity of such an enterprise, how can we believe that they should have acted on a speculation respecting the effects of the interference of the British Parliament with colonial legislation? If, on the other hand, we assume that they were misled by artful leaders, is it credible, that those leaders would have chosen such a time and place for such a project ...?	



Part of how Somerset impelemented it:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/32770312/?terms=cape%2Bslave%2Bregister

advertistement in London times making it look like devious yet clumsy pro-slavery propagandists support the registration bill, referring to: 


https://www.newspapers.com/image/32769272/?terms=cape%2Bslave%2Bregister
	10 Feb 1816

	The Times London

	...One of the greatest mischiefs resulting from the proposed bill, if carried into a law, will be that of throwing the aged and impotent slaves as a burthen upon the public, and thus depriving them of that aid which the law has humanely provided for their support. Every slave, it is to be observed, that is *not* registered, *will be free.*


saying among other things that unregistered slaves would be free, which contributed to:


http://www.nationalarchives.gov.uk/documents/education/bussa.pdf
	...In 1815 the slaves thought that they were going to gain their freedom when Governor Leith returned from Guadeloupe, another Caribbean island. They believed that he was bringing a ‘free paper’ with him to set them free. 

	Letter from Colonel Edward Codd to James Leith, his report of the insurrection, 25th April 1816.

	...I cannot however conclude this report to your Excellency without observing that from the many enquiries, which I have made of the slaves in general, as well as from the evidence and confession of those who have been taken prisoners, it is fully ascertained that the chief cause to which this unfortunate calamity is to be attributed to the general opinion, which has pervaded the minds of those misguided people since the proposed introduction of the Registry Bill, that their emancipation was desired by the British Parliament, and this idea seems to have conveyed by mischievous persons, and the indiscreet conversations of individuals on the measure. 


https://www.newspapers.com/image/390591773/?terms=Barbados%2Binsurrection
	Liverpool Mercury ...17 Jan 1817

	...The session of the Jamaica legislature was opened in the 29th of October. The Governor, in his speech, alluded to the insurrection of the slaves at Barbados, and in the spirit of an enlightened and humane policy, reccommended some colonial legislative enactments, to promote the moral and religious instruction of the black population, and improve their general comfort and happiness.--

	There is something like a demur, or want of sincerity, in the addresses sent up by the house of assembly in answer to the Governor's message. They coldly promise to take his Grace's communication into consideration; but revert to the insurrection at Barbadoes, and charge that unfortunate occurance on certain associations in the mother country, which they accuse of being the means of sending forth delusion among the Negroes in the West India Islands.


https://books.google.com/books?id=AMEbAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA24&lpg=PA24
	Proclamation by His Excellency General the Right Hon. Lord Charles Henry Somerset, &c., &c.

	Whereas it has appeared to me, that notwithstanding all the measures taken to give notoriety to the Proclomation of the 26th April, 1816, for the binding of all Persons to have their Slaves registered, according to the Regulations therein prescribed, there is reason to believe, some well-disposed Persons, from ignorance of such Proclamation, have omitted to comply with the same.

	...And be it further declared, that the Proclamation of the 26th April, 1816, will be strictly enforced against all who shall neglect to register their Slaves according to the Regulation herein enforced in the Country Districts at the expiration of the year 1817. And it is hereby ordered and directed, that his Proclamation, as well as the Proclamation of the 26th April 1816, shall have the fullest publicity; and therefore, beside the usual means of making the same known, I do hereby direct each and every Wardmaster of this Town, and Fieldcornet in the Country Districts, to appoint and assemble one Slave from every house in their respective Wards, and explain, or cause to be explained, to such Slaves so assembled, in the Dutch and Portuguese Languages, the full meaning of this Proclamation so that none may remaing ignorant thereof. And I do further direct the respective Wardmasters and Fieldcornets, to report to His Majesty's Fiscal, and their respectie Landdrosts, their having complied with this Instruction within the shortest possible time from the date hereof, as they shall answer for the contrary at their peril.

	God save the King !

	...20th day of June, 1817

	...C. H. Somerset



https://books.google.com/books?id=r0IWfSobGJEC&pg=PA68&lpg=PA68
	An 1818 report from the Barbados House of Assembly is the only document containing slave testimony, and the only source providing information on the internal organization of the rebellion. However, the report is a problematic document, since, despite its stated aim, uncovering the root of the rebellion was not really its primary purpose. First and foremost, the legislature was refuting an abolitionist publication that asserted that the slaves had rebelled because of poor treatment. Second, it was designed to convince the British public of the danger of championing abolition.


https://books.google.com/books?id=GUUVAAAAQAAJ&pg=PA5s
	Committee felt ... the difficulties which they would have to encounter, arising cheifly from the few sources from which they might be able to derive any insight into the original motives and designs of the INsurgents, which, indeed, were hardly to be discovered but from the information of the misguided men themselves; and they soon found with regret, that these resources were diminished by the unavoidable destruction which took place, at the first commencement of the INsurrection, of some of its principal Leaders, and by the subsequent execution of others;


http://www.nlj.gov.jm/history-notes/The%20Emancipation%20Wars.pdf
	Colonel Codd , the commanding officer , acted promptly by imposing Marshall Law in the early hours of Monday April 15 . Rebellion was short - lived as it was put down by the militia and the Source: Testing the Chains imperial troops (slave soldiers) in three days and effectively over within a week . The Governor stated that one hundred and forty four ( 144 ) persons were executed by September under Marsh all Law , seventy ( 70 ) were sentenced to death while one hundred and seventy ( 170 ) deported to neighbouring islands . Barbados’ topography made it quite easy to put the insurrection down as the land was mainly flat. Slaves who were captured in rebellion, through torturous methods ended up incriminating others which led to further captures . Marshall Law lasted eighty nine ( 89 ) days after it was imposed. Public punishments were done such as floggings and executions ; which also served as notice to slaves of what they would receive if such action was ever replicated (Beckles 87 ).


https://books.google.com/books?id=GUUVAAAAQAAJ&pg=PA5
	--they referred themselves, therefore, to the best sources of information which remained; and from the evidence taken before the Courts-Martian, and from the confessions of many of the prisoners (as stated upon oath by the respective Clergymen who attended them at the places of their execution), they trust that they are enabled satisfactorily to establish the Causes which led to the late melancholy event.

	It appears to your Committee that, towards the latter end of the year one thousand eight hundred and fifteen, a report became generally prevalent among the Slaves of this Island, that the benefits of freedom would probably be extended to them, through the interposition of the friends of the Blacks, in England; and the ensuing festival of Christmas, or the first day of the new year, were respectively reported as the times at which it might be expected that a period would be put to their slavery.

	This vague hope (and uncertain prospect) of freedom seems, although generally diffused, to have been more particularly impressed upon the minds of the Slaves in the Windward parishes, combined with the notion that active exertions were making by the white Inhabitants of the Island, as well as by such Proprietors as were resident in Europe, to prevent this favourable interference on their behalf; and the whole was strengthened by the information, imparted by some free People of colour, as well as by some of the most daring of the Slaves (who had gained an ascendancy over their fellows by being enabled to read and write), and stated to have been obtained from the English Newspapers, which were occasionally produced and read, in order, as it should seem, to enforce conviction on the minds of the hearers.

	...the remarkable confession and deposition of James Bowland (see Appendix E), a Slave belonging to The River Plantation. To this man the benefits of knowledge had been so far extended, as to enable him to read and write; and the deposition bears his signature, written by his own hand. He not only relates the frequent communications and the previous arrangements which were forming during the two or three months immediately preceeding the Insurrection, and with which he was intimately combined, but proceeds to state distinctly, that these movements originated not in any ill-treatment or partial privations under which the Slaves were labouring, but solely and entirely in consequence of intelligence imparted to the Slaves (which intelligence was obtained from the English Newspapers), that their freedom had been granted them in England.


https://www.thedailybeast.com/the-original-slave-colony-barbados-and-andrea-stuarts-sugar-in-the-blood
	“I wanted to take slavery out of its niche,” she said. “It’s not a black story, it’s not a white story. I want to remind people that this story belongs to us all.” Slavery and its legacy—race—still shape our world. But more specifically, the creation of Barbados, the British empire’s earliest, most profitable settlement in the New World, provided the blueprint for all its future slave colonies: South Carolina, North Carolina, Virginia, Georgia, you name it.

	...By century’s end, 80 percent of Barbados’s 85,000 inhabitants were Africans, giving rise to a rigid racial hierarchy: a small elite of whites on top; the masses of black workers on bottom; and, somewhere in between, a small caste of illegitimate mixed-race children, born to masters and their preyed-upon female slaves.


http://www.stmuhistorymedia.org/barbados-slave-codes/
	The Africans were viewed as nothing more than interchangeable machine parts in the process of sugar production. The treatment experienced by the Africans was among the most inhumane in human history.3




https://books.google.com/books?id=GUUVAAAAQAAJ&pg=PA8#v=onepage&q&f=false
	Your Committee, in short, found, that ...for several months preceding the Insurrection in one thousand eight hundred and sixteen, the minds of the Slaves had been unsettled by a frequent repittion of a report, generally spread, that the time was quickly approaching aw which they were to expect their freedom;--That these reports first took their rise immediately after the information in the proposed establishsments of Registation in the British Settlements in the West Indies had been transmitted to the Colony; ...and, lastly, That the INsurrection was entirely owing to these hopes (so originating and so fostered) having been deferred, till the Slaves were led to attempt that by force which they had vainly expected as an original gift from England.


https://books.google.com/books?id=UeHWAQAAQBAJ&pg=PA98&lpg=PA98
	...Colonel Best had changed his views of the rebellion by September 1816, and became critical of the analysis presented in the Assembly's Report. According to Best, the slaves were neither misled by artful leaders, nor driven to rebellion through any misreading of the Registry Bill debate. They were acting on an informed view that they could defeat the whites at this particular juncture, and take effective control over their destinies and the government of the island. The registration crisis which was consuming the political energies of the planters, while at the same time hardening metropolitan views against them, together with the intensity of that year's Easter celebrations, merely provided the climate for the politics of rebellion. After interrogating slave rebels as late as August 1816 Best had accumulated data supportive of his changed analysis of the rebellion. He wrote, 'I once thought before, I am no convinced that they were not entirely if at all led away in the last business by delusion. They conceived themselves to be sufficiently numerous to become masters instead of slaves of the island, and that opinion influenced them into Acts of Rebellion'.


analysis of reasons rebellion didn't work interesting


	...In spite of these failings ... Perhaps the greatest damage done was to the confidence and psychological well-being of the ruling class, in realising that their slaves were determined to overthrow them by violent revolution and to take control of the island. By their act of rebellion, the slaves of Barbados demonstrated that in spite of the abolitionist drive of Wilberforce and his colleagues, for which they were highly praised, they did not see reformist politics alone as sufficient to bring about their freedom. The rebellion was their contribution to the debate over slavery and freedom. Their intentions were clearly expressed. At that juncture revolution was their preferred instrument for the abolition of slavery.





backers of Barbados report and this also clashed:


http://www.nlj.gov.jm/rai/CSEC/BookTheme3/Remarks_on_the_Insurrection_in_Barbadoes.pdf

appears to be active measures dividing wilberforce supporters and pro-slavery people, I guess to politicize issue of abolition and give political cover to drag it out as long as possible

actions of agentura among british gov and certain abolishionists would tend to assign motive to rebellions and slaves asking for freedom among slave owners--instead of wanting freedom and fed up with abuses, were incited by "agents of wilberforce" or something like that. E.g. actions of Somerset would give Cape slave owners an excuse to ignore pleas of slaves themselves. Similar to propaganda about "paid protestors" today. Suspect this influenced development of Boer religion and attitude toward British gov and black people.


...





James Cappon's take on this in 1901:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Y24qAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA242&lpg=PA242
	In 1816 a register of slaves and of slave births was opened in each distict for the inspection of the landdrost. No more Dirks to be carried out in the night-time and no questions asked; no more black things to be baked in ovens in angry Boer matrons! The grandfather of Olive Schreiner's tale must have been very indignant.



Cappon himself being suspicious, this passage interesting:

https://books.google.com/books?id=Y24qAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA242&lpg=PA242
	It was Dr. Philip, the Las Casas of South Africa, Pringle calls him, who first brought the condition of the Hottentot, as distinguished from that of the slave, clearly before his countrymen at home.

	...In the historical controversial part of his book he presents his case, just as Dr. Theal does his, without any real attempt to appreciate the needs, or difficulties, or justifications of the other side. But then we must remember he is not properly a historian or economist, calmly weighing both sides, but a missionary, advocating the cause of the black race.


Las Casas wrecked movement in Spain to stop slaughter of people in Indies while pushing aside others who were doing a better job, in similar manner as Cappon describes Philip.

In other aspects Las Casas behavior consistent with agentura--does Cappon understand him this way? 




------



https://www.koersjournal.org.za/index.php/koers/article/viewFile/720/833
	One of the most important changes that were introduced, was the introduction of the system of Slave Protectors and Guardians.17 Mason (1991:108) describes the effect of this system on the master-slave relationship as follows

	Since these men were independent of, and superior to the masters, the law struck at the heart of the master-slave relationship. It undercut the slave­holders pretensions of being the sole source of protection, discipline and indulgence for their slaves.

	The Guardian of Slaves had to assist slaves in legal proceedings:

	... wherein any Slave may be charged with any offence punishable by Death, Banishment, or Transportation; or wherein any question may arise as to the right of any alleged Slave to Freedom; or wherein any Person may be charged with the Murder of any Slave, or with any offence against the person of any Slave; or wherein any question may arise respecting the right of any Slave to any such Property as he or she is ... declared competent to acquire.18

	The effectiveness of this system was restricted by the fact that the Protector or Guardian only reacted to the complaints lodged by slaves, who in turn were subjected to the serious consequences of unfounded accusations and various other retaliatory measures of slave owners (Mason, 1991:109-115)


	...The efforts of the British authorities were, however, not without success. The moves towards the recognition of slave marriages and their families were a major step in the process of humanizing the position of slaves.21 Slave marriages were eventually even allowed against the will and without the permission of the slave owner. In addition, slaves obtained the restricted right to acquire and own pro­perty and to dispose thereof2

	The right of the slave owner to his property (slaves) and to their labour was regarded as inalienable and sacred. The right acquired by a slave to buy his free­dom, even against the wish of his owner, was therefore experienced as a serious inroad into the inalienable right of ownership which even primitive societies uphold.23

	The master-slave relationship was dealt a severe blow by the restriction placed on owners regarding the working hours of slaves24 and the corporal punishment of their slaves.25

	To support these measures, serious efforts were made to ensure that the rights of the slave community would be upheld. The admissibility of the testimony of slaves in judicial proceedings was reformed,26 the Guardian of Slaves was com­pelled to pursue all complaints lodged by or on behalf of slaves 2

	Clearly the aim of the British authorities was to undermine the philosophical and practical foundations on which slavery was based and to protect slaves from the heartless behaviour of their owners. The heart of the slave system was, however, left untouched. The legislature was reluctant to make any substantial inroad into the property rights of slave owners.28 The authorities’ reluctance to remove the provisions condemning slaves when a complaint against their masters was ruled to be unfounded29 proved to be a major stumbling-block in the execution of slave rights at the Cape. It became evident that the predicament of the slave com­munity would only be resolved by the total abolition of slavery.

	On 1 December 1834 slavery became illegal in British territories.30 It was, how­ever, replaced by a system of apprenticeships31 which, on the pretext of ensuring training and jobs for slaves and labour for the colonists, boiled down to a con­tinuation of the slave system albeit in a more respectable form (Edwards, 1942:117-214; Simon, 1930:216-217; Lovejoy, 1983:233-234). This prolonged harassment of the former slave community ended in 1838 when the system of apprenticeships was finally abolished.




https://books.google.com/books?id=0Sk8AAAAIAAJ&pg=PA272&lpg=PA272


https://www.newspapers.com/image/392073126/?terms=Somerset%2BProclamation%2BCape%2BSlave
	EDUCATION of SLAVE CHILDREN  at the CAPE.

	To the EDITOR of the MORNING CHRONICLE.

	Sir--I beg leave to call your attention to certain statements in a speech of Mr. Willberforce Bird's, delivered at a meeting of the South African Bible Society, and published in The Cape Town Gazette of this day's date.

	Mr. Bird, referring to a Proclamation issued by Lord Charles Somerset on the 18th of March last, which relates to the treatment, education, &c. of the slave population of this colony, characterises it as "a monument of fame, eternal, immortal; as a record of mercy engraven on the hearts of thirty thousand slaves, to be handed down by them to their posterity as long as the system of slavery was permitted to endure." His praise was, however, feeble, when it was recollected, that on the 15th of May the English House of Common had, on the motion of Mr. Secretary Canning, passed an unanimous Address to his Majesty, requesting him to direct the Governors of his Colonies to do *that* which this law of the 18th of March had already proclaimed at the Cape, thus anticipating the wishes of the British House of Commons.

	...this document was only intended for *effect*, but not for *effiency*; in plain terms that it is neither more nor less than a mere *humbug proclamation*, got up by the friends of the slave-holding interest in this colony, for the express purpose of cajoling the Commissioners of Inquiry here and the abolitionists of slavery at home.

	If I have expressed myself in strong language on this occassion, it arises from no feeling of hostility towards an individual with home I have not personally any aquantance, but from my thorough conviction (confirmed by the experience of a long residence in slave Colonies) that the most effectual supporters of Slavery are those who are now too successfully exerting themselves, both at home and abroad, to rivits its chains more firmly, simply by insisting that the task of its abatement and final abolition be left to the Colonial Administrations. But be assured, Sir, that no Colonial Government, of a character such as this at the Cape, will ever voluntarily abate or abolish Slavery.

	They will, indeeded, issue pluasible Proclimations purposely devised to blind the British Public, and they will send out their parasites, regardless of truth or honesty, to trumpet forth the praises of their worthless and hypocritical enactments, but they will never cordially, nor bona fide, concur in any effective measures for accomplishing its abolition. And, indeed, considering what human nature is in general, what else can be expected in countries like this, where, not only the mass of the influential classes, but also all the civil authorities, from the Governor down to the meanest clerk (including every Judge upon the bench and every Magistrate and Secretary in office) are themselves slave-holders, slave-breeders, and slave-dealers, and have their feelings and judgement sinisterly affected, more or less, by the corrupting and hardening effects of this accursed system.

	SCRUTATOR.

	Cape Town, 4th October, 1823.


https://books.google.com/books?id=N7damlJZAkkC&pg=PA48&lpg=PA48
	In May 1823, Thomas Fowell Boxton, who had succeeded Wilberforce as parliamentary leader of the abolitionists, moved a resolution that argued "that the state of slavery is repugnant to the principles of the British Consitution and the Christian religion" and out to be abolished "with as much expedition as may be found consistent with a due regard to the well-being of the parties concerned." Speaking for the government, George Canning proposed a substitute resolution, declaring "the necessity of ameliorating the lot of the slave with a view to fitting him for his freedom at as early a date as was compatable with the welfare and safety of the colonies." The substitute motion carried, and the government was committed to a program of cautious reform. Taking advice from the Society of West India Planters and Merchants, which represented slave-owning interests, the government drew up a model slave code, intending to promulgate it by fiat in the Crown colonies and by persuasion in the legislative colonies. In doing so, the government hoped to offer the abolitionists enough to keep them quiet, while convincing the West Indian planters that reform was politically expedient.

	At the Cape, Governor Somerset had already acted. He issued his amelioration proclomation in March 1823, two montsh before the parliamentary debate on Canning's resolution. Isobel Eirlys Edwards, the most thorough historian of this aspect of Somerset's policy, contended that he did so order to forestall stronger measures from the Colonial Officer. In the preamble to the proclamation, the governor expressed the hope that the law would tend to "civilize" the slaves and "ameliorate" their lot, insofar as was "consistent with the security of the state, and with due consideration to the rights and privileges of all."



------

https://books.google.com/books?id=uKItDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA117&lpg=PA117
	Somerset's proclamation of March 1823 has been much discussed by Cape historians, particularly because it played a role in the colony's most significant slave rebellion.


what happened there?


https://books.google.com/books?id=N7damlJZAkkC&pg=PA48&lpg=PA48&
	The ordinance caused an uproar. Slave owners had three things especially on their minds. First, they feared that a misunderstanding of the law's provisions might incite the slaves to rebellion. In 1824, a mistaken belief that Somerset's proclamation had somehow freed them had allegedly encouraged a group of slaves and Khoisan servants to stage a minor, but bloody, slave revolt in the Worcestor district. Second, slave owners found it outrageous that the law gate to "a third person"--that is the guardian of slaves--"without any right or reason, the odious power of interfering in the arrangement of private affairs." Third, the compulsory manumissions, the slaveholders believed, were an intolerable attenuation of their property rights.


https://books.google.com/books?id=N7damlJZAkkC&pg=PA50&lpg=PA50
	The order of the king in council of 2 February 1830 (known also as "the consolidated ordinance") superseded ordinance 19 in 1831. The most important changes reduced the number of lashes that could be applied legally to male slaves to fifteen and prohibited the whipping of female slaves altogether. The order required the slaveholders to keep record books of all punishments inflicted and to submit the books semi-anually to the renamed "protectors of slaves" for inspection. while the title of the officeholders changed from guardian to protector, their duties remained the same. The Consolidated Order sparked a second, stronger round of protests, producing a flood of petitions signed by perhaps one-quarter of the colony's sixty-four hundered slave owners, denouncing the revised law and especially the punishment record books. The protests culminated in a five-day slave owner's riot in the wine country village of Stellenbosch at the time that the books were first to be examined. In the event, the sections of the order mandating the keeping of the record books were never seriously enforced. A further revision of the slave law, effective in 1832, served principally to close loopholes in the Consolidated Order and was the occasion for further protests from the slaveholders outraged by constant tinkering with what they saw as fundamentally unjust laws.


